   #First World War Hidden History » Feed First World War Hidden History »
   Comments Feed First World War Hidden History WordPress.com

     * Unmasking The Myths And Lies
     * How And Why It All Began
     * About The Authors
          + Gerry Docherty
          + Jim Macgregor
     * Publications Available
          + Prolonging The Agony
          + Sie wollten den Krieg
          + Hidden History
          + L’Histoire occultée
          + Verborgene Geschichte

First World War Hidden History

   Search: Search…_____________ Go
   First World War Hidden History

Questioning History. Would you like to take part?

   23 Friday Aug 2019

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Uncategorized

   ≈ Leave a comment

   Although we have stopped our World War 1 blogs for the time- being, Jim
   and I frequently liaise with other researchers, to which end Jim will
   be visiting Canada shortly. I have been giving a number of talks since
   these blogs began, having been invited to speak at the Edinburgh
   International Book Festival, at conferences in Brussels and Dublin, for
   several groups in London and on a World War 1 battlefields trip through
   France and Belgium.

   I have been invited to speak at an exciting conference in December,
   details of which can be found below. The conference is entitled
   Questioning History and I have been asked to talk on two subjects,
   namely The Coup of 1916 ( which bears remarkable similarities to what
   is happening to us today ) and The True history of a great British
   Patriot, Edith Cavell.

   The whole project which is led by Professor Gloria Moss from the
   University of Hertford looks really varied and interesting.
   She has produced a short promotional video for the weekend of 14/15
   December – see https://youtu.be/HR7FGLcybU8.  It would be great to see
   and meet others who share our interest in why history is regularly
   hidden. The event comprises:
   –  Pre-Christmas weekend on  ‘Questioning History’
   – date of 14-15 December
   – 30/40 mins from London
   –  Early Bird tickets throughout August and first two weeks of
   September
   –  Website https://awakeandawareholid.wixsite.com/website
   – Email: all inquiries to awakeandawareholidays@gmail.com
   – Books and videos by speakers available for sale (and signed making
   excellent gifts)
   Thanks again for all of your support over the years,
   Gerry Docherty
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

The Only Way Is Onwards

   24 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Secret Elite, Wall Street

   ≈ 1 Comment

   We have come to the end of our blogs covering the running of the First
   World War by the Secret Elites in London and then, as the money-power
   flexed its muscle, America. The whole expose is recorded in Prolonging
   the Agony, which is now available through Amazon and can be ordered by
   quality bookshops.

   Prolonging The Agony by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty Hidden
   History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Though this is by no means the end of the line, we will take a break
   from the weekly blogs but hope to release occasional pieces as evidence
   is slowly unmasked across the world.

   Thanks to everyone who contributed in any way, to our regular readers
   whose encouragement and contributions we greatly appreciated. You guys
   care was we do. Where circumstances allow point doubters to our blogs
   or either of the major works, Hidden History, The Secret Origins of the
   First World War and, just released, Prolonging the Agony, How the
   Anglo-American Establishment Deliberately Extended WW1 by
   Three-and-a-Half Years.

   Take care in a world where we are still lied to by governments, as was
   the case one hundred years ago.

   Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence

   17 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Fake History, Gallipoli, Hiding Sources,
   Propaganda, Secret Elite

   ≈ Leave a comment

   Establishment historians place great value on the use of primary source
   evidence. This is described as ‘Narrative Fixation’ by the heterodox
   economist Edward Fullbrook [1] who cites Einstein’s famous aphorism:
   ‘Whether you can observe a thing or not depends on the theory which you
   use: It is the theory which decides what can be observed.’

   Professor Fullbrook stated that in his academic field, by adopting a
   single point of view and refusing to admit alternative insights,
   economists deprive themselves of the means of a fuller understanding of
   the matters they seek to explain. But it is not just in economics that
   such limitations become apparent. The narrative fixation on the
   dialectical side of scientific development has had, and continues to
   have, a deleterious consequence in the human sciences. This involves
   all of the Humanities and Social Sciences including, as we see here,
   History. In any attempt to understand a complex truth, what is required
   is a multiplicity of points of view – a width of methodologies and
   epistemologies – a ‘Narrative Pluralism’ – but academic historians have
   a narrative fixation: No documents; no narrative. [2] In an article,
   The Frailty of Historical Truth: Learning Why Historians Inevitably
   Fail, published by the American Historical Association, Professor David
   Lowenthal stated, ‘Secondary sources are ipso facto unreliable.’ [3]

   The fundamental problem in war history, as we and other revisionists
   have clearly demonstrated, lies in the fact that it is underpinned by
   primary sources which are unreliable – not least because so many have
   been systematically destroyed, falsified, altered, misrepresented,
   hidden or ‘lost’. In the absence of reliable primary source evidence,
   it is entirely legitimate – indeed it is mandatory on the part of
   truth-seekers – to look to other means of establishing what has
   occurred, what continues to happen and why. Secondary
   sources/circumstantial evidence are a taboo in historical research, yet
   they play such an important role in the criminal law courts and can
   literally mean a matter of life or death? In homicide cases or other
   serious felonies, police detectives act much like historians in
   searching the past for evidence. If it is considered that sufficient
   evidence has been uncovered, the accused is sent for trial before a
   jury of his peers.

   The gold standard in law courts is direct evidence, but in the majority
   of cases there is none and only indirect circumstantial evidence is
   available. By way of example, direct evidence is presented if a witness
   states that she saw the defendant pull out a gun and actually shoot the
   victim. On the other hand, if she did not witness the shooting but saw
   the defendant enter a house with a gun, heard a gunshot and screaming
   and thereafter saw the defendant leave carrying the gun, it is
   circumstantial evidence. If two or more independent witnesses testify
   to this, it is very powerful circumstantial evidence.

   Circumstantial evidence – and that includes fingerprints and forensic
   evidence presented by expert witnesses – allows for more than one
   explanation. When different strands of such evidence are drawn together
   and each corroborates the conclusions drawn from the others, we have
   every reason to the serious notice. For hundreds of years attorneys
   have talked about the ‘cable’ of circumstantial evidence. A cable is
   made up of many strands which individually are not particularly strong,
   but the more strands which are applied to the cable the stronger it
   becomes. In many, if not indeed the majority of legal cases, it is this
   cable of circumstantial evidence which solidly links an accused to the
   crime. Juries in the United States and elsewhere are entitled to reach
   a verdict on such evidence, and Judges are able to condemn an
   individual to death on the strength of that verdict. The U.S. Supreme
   Court has stated that ‘circumstantial evidence is intrinsically no
   different from testimonial [direct] evidence,’ [4] yet academic war
   historians deride its use.

   Straightforward lies, concealment of important evidence, a peer review
   system that encourages only accounts sympathetic to the Establishment,
   and insistence on using only primary source documents (which in reality
   are generally the remnants which have survived the Establishment’s
   cull) are all important elements in the production of fake history.

   In the early 1970s, Canadian war historian Nicholas D’Ombrain began
   researching British War Office records. He noted: ‘The Registry Files
   were in a deplorable condition, having suffered the periodic ravages of
   the policy of “weeding”. One such clearance was in progress during my
   foray into these files, and I found that my material was being
   systematically reduced by as much as five-sixths.’ [5] Astonishingly, a
   large amount of ‘sensitive’ material was actually removed as the
   researcher went about his business. Where did it go? He accused the
   establishment of systematic withdrawal of evidence. Who authorised its
   removal? In addition, D’Ombrain noted that minutes of the Committee of
   Imperial Defence and ‘circulation and invitation lists’ together with
   much ‘routine’ correspondence had been destroyed. [6] That D’Ombrain
   found five-sixths of the total files melting away in front of him
   demonstrated clearly that unnamed others still retained a vested
   interest in keeping hidden, genuine evidence of historical record.

   On conducting our own research we noted that the official notice in the
   Public Record Office List of Cabinet Papers warns, ‘the papers listed …
   are certainly not the whole of those collectively considered by Cabinet
   Ministers.’ The gap, however, is breath-taking. No effort is made to
   explain why crucial records are missing or what happened to them.
   Nothing is included from 14 July until 20 August, 1914. Nothing. This
   period covered the crucial two week ‘July Crisis’ in the run up to the
   First World War, the British declaration of war on Germany on 4 August,
   and the files remain empty until almost three weeks into the war
   itself. [7] It beggars belief that such crucial Cabinet papers relating
   to one of the most significant events in British history have
   disappeared.

   While official Cabinet papers for the time frame do not exist –
   presumably destroyed (the files at the National Archives at Kew in
   London were completely empty) we know what was going on in some detail
   because Prime Minister Asquith (aka ‘Squiffy’ because it was alleged
   that he drank a bottle of cleared each evening) was writing letters to
   his paramour, Venetia Stanley, and sharing secret Cabinet details with
   her. Had Asquith not communicated privately and very indiscreetly to
   his young paramour, much of what was discussed at those crucial
   meetings would be lost to history. His letters of August 2, 3, 4, 5, 6,
   8, 9, 10, 11, 12, contain the inner secrets of what was said by whom in
   those crucial Cabinet meetings whose minutes were presumably destroyed.
   The Letters to Venetia Stanley, essentially Asquith’s love letters [8]
   was collated in 1982 and therefore not subject to the post-war censor.
   This unquestionably saved the information from being redacted or
   burned.

   When researching later Cabinet Memoranda housed in the National
   Archives, [9] pages were found to be missing. Page 685, which was in a
   series which included crucial confidential documents about Herbert
   Hoover’s Belgian Relief, has been torn out. Despite this, we had more
   than sufficient evidence to prove that Britain and America were
   secretly provisioning Germany through Hoover’s organisation in order to
   prolong the war. Countless documents are missing, but in fairness to
   the librarians and custodians of the Public Record Office, they could
   only catalogue what was passed to them from the Cabinet Office, the
   Foreign Office, the War Office and the Colonial Office. It is not the
   fault of librarians.

   An Australian expert on Gallipoli, Harvey Broadbent, had a similar
   experience when researching the archives: ‘… Difficulties lie in the
   fact that not all Gallipoli documents seem to be present in the
   National Archives. There are gaps in document collections of certain
   events and at crucial times of the campaign.’ [10] Broadbent, though
   reluctant to say so in public, harbours suspicions that the 1915
   Gallipoli campaign (where over a quarter of a million allied soldiers
   and sailors, including many from Australia and New Zealand, were killed
   or badly wounded) was deliberately set up to fail by the British and
   French governments. We gathered many individual strands of
   circumstantial evidence on this, wound them in to a very strong rope,
   and have absolutely no doubts whatsoever that it was indeed
   deliberately set up to fail.

   The doomed project went ahead to enable greater geo-political
   strategies which would benefit the Secret Elite, including post-war
   control of oil in the Middle East and control of Palestine. Gallipoli
   was a disaster for the allies in 1915 and the truth had to be concealed
   at all costs from the peoples of colonial Australia and New Zealand or
   they would have reacted severely against both the ‘Mother country’ and
   the war. Yet the lies persist, and the Anzacs continue to cerebrate a
   disaster dressed as a glorious sacrifice; an honour to Australian and
   New Zealand youth. Lies, lies, lies.

   It is evident that falsification of the history of the twentieth
   century has involved a wide range of nefarious subterfuge. Today, the
   accepted mainstream version continues to be taken as the source for new
   books and documentaries in film and television. The ideal of
   objectivity was abandoned long ago. Highly biased and selective choices
   were made from the infinite number of true facts. Some were given a
   central place, others marginalised. Facts were selected to align with
   the narrative which the oligarchs demanded. Many inaccurate, muddled or
   tainted primary sources were chosen to mislead. A range of documents
   might be brought into the public domain with one crucial piece of the
   jigsaw removed. This skewed the picture, deliberately. And there were
   lies, outrageous lies, levied against anyone who stood as a potential
   barrier to elite rule and one world government by exposing the truth.
   Yet all of that is merely the tip of the rotten iceberg and represents
   what we can actually recognise when we scrutinise the given record.
   Below the surface lie vast quantities of documents removed from public
   scrutiny and hidden away in places such as Stanford and Hanslope. It
   seems possible, if not indeed likely, that other as yet unknown
   depositories exist. It is impossible to say how many records remain
   concealed to this day, or have already found their way into furnaces in
   a factual holocaust. As an iceberg in warmer water gradually melts and
   recedes from the bottom up, so the records decrease in volume, unseen,
   unknown and unreported as more and more are selected for destruction.
   In the age of mass communication we have less access to the truth about
   history than the generations before us. This is no mistake.

   As in so many other areas, when researching history a good opening
   question is: Cui bono? Who benefits from this systematically destroyed,
   falsified, altered, hidden or ‘lost’ evidence? The Elites, past and
   present? The court historians whose success is predicated upon
   conformity?

   In the words of Professor Hillel Ticktin, academic economics, is
   ‘useless – utterly useless’. So too in any objective sense is academic
   history. Its value resides only in supporting the present-day elites
   who pay the piper and own the pipes.

   If Orwell’s aphorism holds true it is imperative that we revise the
   entire historical record of the twentieth century. It may already be
   too late, but we have to dispel pessimism to stand any chance of taking
   control of our own future. Much has already been done by revisionists
   such as Harry Elmer Barnes, Antony Sutton and Guido Preparata, and not
   least by Carroll Quigley who provided the signposts we need on this
   complex journey. But the ruling elite today are more adept at burying
   the truth than ever – as witnessed by the vast percentage of the
   ‘educated’ peoples of the world who remain totally unaware of their
   existence, or the fact that democracy is a sham. Modern history in its
   entirety requires grassroots revision.

   There is too another concern. The selection of approved versions of
   history dictates what is taught in our universities and schools.
   Scottish schoolchildren are taught certain aspects of the First World
   War but all contentious issues are absent from the syllabus. Attending
   a conference in Brussels several years ago we learned that Belgian
   schoolchildren are taught absolutely nothing about the ‘Committee for
   the Relief of Belgium’ which was directly at the centre and the most
   significant institution in the country’s First World War history.
   Internationally, university professors and departmental heads determine
   the body of knowledge from which degrees are judged. Armed with their
   prized degrees, those who progress to a career in history are obliged
   to teach from the same sacred scripture in schools, colleges or
   universities. No one questions this. No one dares. School and college
   students are then examined on their historical learning and
   understanding from texts blessed with institutional approval. Thus,
   generation after generation, we witness the perpetuation and
   consolidation of fake history.

   It would be ludicrous to suggest that all modern historians or war
   historians are intentionally producing fake history, but they raise no
   dissenting voice against those who do. The distressing reality is that
   brave revisionist historians are a very rare breed indeed. Academic
   historians of all colours need to muster their courage to speak truth
   to power and stop toeing the Establishment line. The fact that it is
   not historians but ordinary men and women who are at the vanguard of
   the historical truth movement today brings shame to their profession.
   The verdict of history itself will surely judge them harshly.

   1. E. Fullbrook, Narrative Fixation in Economics, World Economics
   Association, London, 2016.
   2. Dr. John O’Dowd, personal communication.
   3. David Lowenthal, The Frailty of Historical Truth: Learning Why
   Historians Inevitably Fail, American Historical Association.
   https://www.historians.org/publications-and-directories/perspectives-on
   -history/march-2013/the-frailty-of-historical-truth
   4. Holland v. United States, 348 U.S. 121, 75 S. Ct.127, 99 OL. Ed.150
   [1954]
   5. Nicholas D’Ombrain, War Machinery and High Policy, preface, p.xiii.
   6. Ibid.
   7. List of Cabinet Papers, 1880–1914. PRO booklet.
   8. Michael Brock, H.H.Asquith letters to Venetia Stanley.
   9. Cabinet Papers, 1905-1918 Volume IV ref: FO 899/4.
   10. Harvey Broadbent, Gallipoli: One Great Deception?
   http://www.abc.net.au/news/2009-04-24/30630
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 5: The Peer Review Process

   10 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Fake History, Hiding Sources

   ≈ Leave a comment

   Together with the omission of crucial documents, control of the
   narrative itself is another mechanism for creating fake history. This,
   ironically, is achieved by applying the academic principles of
   historical research which are meant to prevent junk history; the peer
   review process. Peer review involves a manuscript or research proposal
   being read and evaluated anonymously by scholars who are themselves
   part and parcel of the system. They may have considerable expertise in
   the period, subject matter, languages, and documents with which the
   author deals, but they have a list of criteria to which the aspiring
   historical author must bend the knee. And herein lies the finesse of
   the overall system which prevents true history emerging. Work which
   fails to display knowledge of existing work or fails to provide what
   they deem as valid evidence, will not be approved. It will be damned as
   weak, and appropriate revisions and resubmissions will be demanded.

   In other words, the fake history of the approved ‘eminent’ Court
   Historian has to be included. Where valid documentary evidence has been
   destroyed, corrupted, removed, culled and so forth, then the author is
   limited to the scraps which have survived. Thus, at a stroke, the
   permanent withdrawal of primary source documents at Stanford and
   Hanslope achieves its aim. Researchers cannot move beyond the
   parameters created by those who actually determine what can or cannot
   be accepted as history. They have to play the peer review game to
   advance their careers. They are required to stay on the mainline train
   and regurgitate that which the elites want us to believe is true
   history. Those who deviate or question the process are not tolerated.
   The only route is the mainline track, laid down by the great
   universities from chairs of history funded and controlled by the
   corrupted system.

   According to the American Historical Association, the peer review
   entails a manuscript or research proposal being read and evaluated by
   other scholars with expertise in the time period, subject matter,
   languages, and documents with which the author deals. As peers of the
   author in a specialised field, these reviewers provide analysis to the
   review boards of agencies on the scholarly significance of the article:
   Does the author display knowledge of existing work in the field? Does
   the research design, processes and methodologies, for example, conform
   with professional standards? Does the author advance an original
   argument and provide valid evidence to support the work? If particular
   areas are weak or absent in the presentation, the peer reviewers
   suggest revisions that will strengthen the project and call for
   resubmission before funding is awarded or a manuscript is accepted for
   publication. Scholars support the concept of carefully monitored peer
   review as the fairest way possible to ensure disinterested evaluation
   of research. The American Historical Association believes that such
   peer review will best serve the American people who fund the research.
   [1] Absorb that, please. ‘Will best serve the American people who fund
   the research.’ So private funding should be expected to serve the
   funders. If the state is the funder, it should serve the state. Believe
   us, it does.

   The peer review process may appear the ideal means by which the quality
   and honesty of historical writing are ensured. And it is claimed that
   although it is not perfect, it is the best safeguard that academic
   standards in history have. Reality, however, is different. Well-known,
   establishment historians who support the status quo are more likely to
   be recruited as peer reviewers. In the field of war history especially,
   it is actually used as a means to sustain and promulgate the junk
   history it is supposed to weed out. The ‘competent, qualified and
   unbiased reviewers’ who ‘best serve the American people’ are, in
   practice, highly critical of articles that contradict their own
   mainstream narratives. They reject them outright. The fact that their
   narratives and meta-narratives serve the purposes of Money Power and
   other elites may be incidental, but is not coincidental, to their
   epistemological deficiencies. Only official ‘academic’ interpretations
   and narratives are permitted, and have displaced all other points of
   view in US and European universities. Naturally, these other points of
   view are not conducive to the elite interests and consequently are
   effectively outlawed. The mechanism of displacement is the very matter
   of peer-review. All ‘revisionist’ voices are starved to death. [2] We
   have demonstrated, time and again in our books, how central Oxford
   University remains the guardian of establishment history in Britain.
   Shades of an Orwellian dystopia darken the academic freedoms which have
   long been touted as the mark of an advanced liberal society.

   Worryingly, similarities with corruption in academic history and
   academic medical/pharmaceutical research and reporting appear to be on
   the increase. Senior academic historians who have succumbed to the lure
   of status and position, and sold their integrity for financial rewards
   are to be found in many fields. The corruption of science-based
   medicine and academic history offers striking parallels. Like peer
   review in history, the process provides neither an assured filtering
   process for incorrect findings nor a guarantor of the researchers’
   integrity. Professor Richard Horton, editor-in chief of the Lancet –
   recognised as one of the most highly respected peer-reviewed medical
   journals in the world – stated recently that the case against science
   is straightforward: ‘much of the scientific literature, perhaps half,
   may simply be untrue. Afflicted by studies with small sample sizes,
   tiny effects, invalid exploratory analyses, and flagrant conflicts of
   interest, together with an obsession for pursuing fashionable trends of
   dubious importance, science has taken a turn towards darkness.’ [3]
   History has been faked and science turned towards darkness. Alarm bells
   should be sounding across the universe. We continue to be lied to.

   These ‘flagrant conflicts of interest’ are the root of the problem in
   both history and medicine, with a number of senior academics in both
   fields labouring not for the truth, but for lucrative bonuses paid by
   powerful paymasters with set agendas. Professor Horton added;
   ‘Scientists too often sculpt data to fit their preferred theory of the
   world.’ Horton admits that medical journals themselves are not
   blameless: ‘Journal editors deserve their fair share of criticism too.
   We aid and abet the worst behaviours.’ [4] Exactly the same charge can
   be levelled against even the most prestigious of history journals.

   In 2011 the British Medical Journal quoted Dr Marcia Angell, a long
   time editor of yet another highly regarded peer-reviewed medical
   journal, The New England Journal of Medicine: ‘It is simply no longer
   possible to believe much of the clinical research that is published, or
   to rely on the judgment of trusted physicians or authoritative medical
   guidelines. I take no pleasure in this conclusion, which I reached
   slowly and reluctantly over my two decades as an editor of the New
   England Journal of Medicine.” [5]

   In the New York Review of Books, Dr Angell reviewed the work of whistle
   blowers in the medical field. She revealed that no one knows the total
   slush money provided by drug companies to influence results, but it’s
   estimated that the top nine U.S. drug companies alone pay out tens of
   billions of dollars a year. As a direct consequence, Big Pharma has
   gained enormous control over how doctors evaluate and use its products.
   ‘Its extensive ties to physicians, particularly senior faculty at
   prestigious medical schools, affect the results of research, the way
   medicine is practiced, and even the definition of what constitutes a
   disease.’ He added that compromised physicians at the highest levels
   set the guidelines and treatment recommendations nationally. They sit
   on governmental advisory panels, head professional societies and speak
   at regular meetings and dinners that take place to teach clinicians
   about prescription drugs. [6] Morality is dead. Killed by the greed of
   the money power.

   A recent survey found that about two thirds of academic medical centres
   hold equity interest in companies that sponsor research within the same
   institution. A study of medical school department chairs found that two
   thirds received departmental income from drug companies and three
   fifths received personal income. ‘Of the 170 contributors to the most
   recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic and
   Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM), ninety-five had financial
   ties to drug companies, including all of the contributors to the
   sections on mood disorders and schizophrenia.’ Billions were being
   spent on unnecessary, non-efficacious psychiatric medicines that might
   well be doing more harm than good, even to very young children. For
   example the professor of psychiatry at Harvard Medical School, who also
   held the post of chief of paediatric psychopharmacology at Harvard’s
   Massachusetts General Hospital, was largely responsible for children as
   young as two years old being diagnosed with bipolar disorder and
   treated with a cocktail of powerful drugs. The professor’s studies of
   the drugs were, as The New York Times summarised, ‘so small and loosely
   designed that they were largely inconclusive.’ A U.S. Senator revealed
   that drug companies, including those that make the drugs the professor
   advocated for childhood bipolar disorder, had paid him $1.6 million in
   consultation and speaking fees. Two of his colleagues received similar
   amounts. [7]

   But this was by no means limited to psychiatry. ‘In 2004, after the
   National Cholesterol Education Program called for sharply lowering the
   desired levels of “bad” cholesterol, it was revealed that eight of nine
   members of the panel writing the recommendations had financial ties to
   the makers of cholesterol-lowering drugs.’ It is also evident that many
   members of the standing committees of experts that advise the FDA on
   drug approvals also have financial ties to the pharmaceutical industry.
   [8]

   Big pharmaceutical companies and the Money Power are, of course,
   closely related and their corruption of science based medicine and
   academic history bear striking similarities. They have extensive ties
   to senior faculty at prestigious universities where they fund
   departmental professorial chairs. They compromise physicians and
   historians at the highest level with lucrative bonuses, and highly
   remunerated lecture tours where they disseminate the ‘sculpted data’
   which harmonises with the false accounts demanded by their paymasters.
   The peer review process in both specialities has been thoroughly
   comprised. It is clear that some senior individuals in the medical
   field have sold their honesty and integrity, just as have some senior
   academic historians, but overall the medical profession can be
   justifiably proud of the fact that honest doctors and medical journals
   are prepared to expose the corruption and name and shame those
   involved.

   There is, alas, no such response to be found in the academic history
   profession where not one solitary voice has been raised against the
   corrupters or the corruption.

   1. American Historical Association, Statement on Peer Review for
   Historical Research, (2005).
   https://www.historians.org/jobs-and-professional-development/statements
   -standards-and-guidelines-of-the-discipline/statement-on-peer-review-fo
   r-historical-research
   2. Dr. John O’Dowd, personal communication.
   3.
   http://www.thelancet.com/pdfs/journals/lancet/PIIS0140-6736%2815%296069
   6-1.pdf
   4. Ibid.
   5. http://www.bmj.com/content/342/bmj.d284
   6.
   http://www.nybooks.com/articles/2009/01/15/drug-companies-doctorsa-stor
   y-of-corruption/
   7. Ibid.
   8. Ibid.
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 4: Concealment Of British War-time Documents

   03 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Hiding Sources, Oxford University,
   Propaganda, Secret Elite, United Kingdom

   ≈ Leave a comment

   The British government secret archive centre at Hanslope.

   The Hoover Institution at Stanford was not the sole depository for the
   concealment and sifting of incriminatory documents. In his book The
   History Thieves, Ian Cobain, an investigative journalist with The
   Guardian newspaper in London, revealed a secret facility just an hour’s
   drive north of London. Concealed in dense woodland near the tiny hamlet
   of Hanslope, lies ‘one of the most secure facilities operated by any
   government, anywhere in the world.’ It is an outpost used by Britain’s
   domestic and foreign spy agencies, MI5 and MI6 and guarded by a
   seven-foot-high chain-link fence, just beyond which is a ten-foot-high
   fence topped with coils of razor wire. Every few yards between the
   fences are closed-circuit television cameras and floodlights. Cobain
   wrote, ‘Only from the air can the enormous scale of the compound be
   comprehended, it measures almost half a mile across … It is a perfect
   place to bury difficult secrets.’ [1]

   And bury difficult secrets they have. Cobain exposed how millions of
   files containing top secret British government documents are kept at
   Hanslope Park. They date back further even that the First World War.
   Some which were recently released, albeit very reluctantly under direct
   order of the Courts of Law, revealed the true horrors of British
   colonial rule in Kenya and elsewhere in the world. The Hanslope
   documents are among those which have survived the bonfires. Cobain
   described how just prior to Malaya’s independence from Britain, five
   truckloads of sensitive documents relating to British colonial rule
   were driven 220 miles from Kuala Lumpur under police escort to the
   naval base at Singapore ‘and destroyed in the Navy’s splendid
   incinerator there’.

   Types of secret records held at Hansfield.

   Papers at the National Archives at Kew ‘testified to a worldwide purge
   of sensitive or damning documentation: there was correspondence that
   described the laborious burning of papers; there were telegrams from
   London giving precise instructions for methods of destruction; there
   were even “destruction certificates”, signed and witnessed by colonial
   officials to confirm that certain classes of documents had been
   incinerated.’ [2] Systematic and institutional vandalism aimed at
   wiping out the truth.

   Controversial files relating to Britain’s colonial outrages were
   destroyed, and there can be no doubt whatsoever that files
   incriminating British responsibility for starting WW1, have likewise
   either been destroyed or hidden in the vaults at Hanslope. ‘Files have
   been concealed for years, held where no historian or lawyer or
   interested member of the public could find them.’ [3] Many of these
   documents have been withheld well beyond the freedom of information
   time limits for the release of confidential papers. Freedom of
   Information laws exist, but so many exemptions are applied that it can
   still prove impossible to access documents that are a century and more
   old. [4] It is difficult to decide what is the greatest outrage;
   concealment of the documents or the fact that academic historians and
   mainstream journalists have remained totally supine when they should be
   standing up to the Money Power and creating hell about this. Ian Cobain
   is an exception and we are indebted to him.

   The fruits of our research very clearly show that the entire mainstream
   thesis that Germany was to blame for the war, is a complete
   fabrication. This leads us to the inevitable but depressing conclusion
   that, apart from the few notable exceptions, brave and honest war
   historians are few and far between. Before the First World War had even
   begun, a dedicated team of ‘eminent’ English court historians was
   brought together at Oxford University and richly rewarded for creating
   anti-German propaganda in the form of ‘Oxford Pamphlets.’

   One of the Oxford propaganda pamphlets for WW1.

   They created fake history which blamed a completely innocent Germany
   while depicting Britain as the saviour of the free world. It was but
   the beginning of a great lie. The vast majority of academics beyond
   Oxford unwittingly swallowed the great lie, or were too cowed to
   question it. The ‘argument from authority’ meant that it was true
   because an authority figure said so. Little has changed over the
   intervening century. To this day Court Historians churn out new books
   about the First World War. They throw in the odd caveat that Germany
   was not solely to blame, but basically rehash the old lies about German
   guilt.. These books are extravagantly praised by fellow Court
   Historians, and puffed and critiqued in the mainstream media as ‘new
   and radical interpretations’. It is likely that a number of academics
   outside the charmed circle recognise the falsehood, but comfortable
   academic careers, incomes and mortgages have to be protected. The quiet
   life is infinitely better to being hounded out of a job and ridiculed
   as a ‘conspiracy theory’ crank. We understand that. they have jobs to
   keep, mortgages to keep, families to feed.

   In faking history, lies are created and truth is twisted or suppressed.
   Revisionists presenting genuine historical information are fiercely
   criticised and their work publicly ridiculed. Quite ludicrously, the
   ‘anti-Semitic’ pejorative is thrown around like mud today if one even
   mentions ‘international bankers’. Our Hidden History has been subjected
   to attacks on the web by what some consider to be a paid disinformation
   agent of the Money Power. Bold revisionist historians such as Professor
   Harry Elmer Barnes who stood virtually alone in revealing the true
   history of WW1, and Professor Antony Sutton and Dr Guido Preparata, who
   revealed Wall Street’s role in creating Hitler and WW2, were brilliant
   American scholars whose careers were ruined for daring to speak truth
   about the real holders of power.

   Thankfully, we are both retired and now have no careers to protect.

   The polar opposite of revisionists are the ‘eminent’ historians willing
   to sell themselves in return for important professorships, stellar
   careers, lucrative lecture tours, television documentary productions
   and book publishing deals. These are the individuals carefully selected
   to create false histories. Glowing critiques of their work in the
   controlled mainstream media are assured. The odd Pulitzer Prize or
   knighthood in Britain will be thrown in for good measure. But such
   acquiescence to falsehood among academic historians is not simply a
   modern phenomenon. Classics scholar Professor Peter Wiseman relates how
   ancient historiography is plagued by mendacious writings from ‘modest
   elaboration of fact to outright, even flagrant, lying.’ [5]

   Peter Hoffer, Research Professor of History at the University of
   Georgia

   Peter Hoffer, Research Professor of History at the University of
   Georgia, explained just how difficult it now is for historical truth to
   prevail: Lying may be rational or illogical or both, but it is a
   subject that cannot be avoided in any philosophy of history for our
   time. History itself is replete with lies and lying. The best and worst
   example is the big lie. The big lie is a simple message of allegedly
   great importance. Repeated over and over, despite the piling up of
   counter-evidence, it has a power that truth cannot deflect and evidence
   to the contrary cannot undo … [however], a lie does not have to be all
   that big to make a difference in history. [6]

   In bygone days such dishonest academics operated under the patronage of
   Europe’s royal courts and were termed ‘Court Historians’. They related
   only accounts that were favourable to the monarchy, no matter how false
   they might be. The power of royalty has greatly diminished, but Court
   Historians remain a significant entity. They remain the intellectual
   bodyguards of the State. They shape and defend the ‘official line’ or
   interpretation on the State’s wars, its presidential regimes, foreign
   policy or other key historical events and policies. As a result they
   enjoy high esteem and recognition in the mainstream media and academia.
   As defenders of the status quo they frequently attack and label their
   critics as ‘conspiracy theorists, revisionists, isolationists,
   appeasers, anti-intellectuals, or other bogey men, rather than engage
   in civil discourse or discussion. [7]

   John Tosh, Professor of History at Roehampton University

   There are, of course, more subtle ways of projecting fake history than
   the straightforward big lie or concealment/destruction of evidence.
   John Tosh, Professor of History at Roehampton University, London, and
   former Vice-President of the Royal Historical Society, has studied the
   basics of historiography and the problems involved in using primary and
   secondary sources in ascertaining ‘facts’. Tosh related how many
   primary sources used in historical works are inaccurate, muddled, based
   on hearsay or actually ‘intended to mislead’. Indeed, ‘the majority of
   sources are in some way inaccurate, incomplete or tainted by prejudice
   and self-interest.’ [8] According to Professor Tosh ‘Historical writing
   of all kinds is determined as much by what it leaves out as by what it
   puts in’. [9] Add that to the fact that so many primary sources have
   been concealed or destroyed, and the honest investigator faces a major
   barrier to the truth.

   Professor Herbert Butterfield,

   The late Cambridge University historian, Professor Herbert Butterfield,
   warned that omission of important documents from the historical record
   is not always the fault of historians employed by government. They can
   only deal with the material they are given. The processes by which
   official papers are accumulated offers government officials and
   individual Cabinet Ministers the opportunity to cull these before they
   are handed over. As Professor Quigley explained, many of these
   political figures are effectively puppets of the Secret Elite.

   Thereafter, when the official histories are read by the public they
   have no idea what has been suppressed or withheld. It may be that a
   single document is more important than all the rest – the exclusion of
   one document out of three hundred is even capable of destroying the
   clue to the whole series. … It has proved possible in the history of
   historical science for a release of diplomatic documents to carry
   students further away from the truth than before, if the release has
   not been a total one. [10] On the role of ‘official’ government
   historians Professor Butterfield adds: ‘… Nothing could be more subtle
   than the influence of upon historians of admission to the charmed
   circle … a well-run State needs no heavy-handed censorship, for it
   binds the historian with soft charms and with subtle, comfortable
   chains.’ [11]

   1. Ian Cobain, The History Thieves, pp. 101-103.
   2. Ibid., pp. 119-120.
   2. Ibid., p. 109.
   4. 1bid., p. 160.
   5. T.P. Wiseman, Lying Historians: Seven Types of Mendacity.
   http://liverpool.universitypressscholarship.com/view/10.5949/liverpool/
   9780859893817.001.0001/upso-9780859893817-chapter-4
                                        6. Peter Hoffer, The Historians
   Paradox, The Study of History in our Time, p.88.
   7. http://www.johnccarleton.org/court_historians.html
   8. John Tosh, The Pursuit of History: Aims, Methods and New Directions
   in the Study of Modern History, pp.33, 65-66.
   9. Ibid., pp. 136-137.
   10. Herbert Butterfield, History and Human Relations, pp. 201-209.
   11. Ibid., p. 198.
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 3: From Burning Correspondence To Permanently Removing
The Evidence

   27 Tuesday Mar 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Uncategorized

   ≈ 6 Comments

   From its conception in 1891, members of the secret society have taken
   exceptional care to remove all traces of the conspiracy. Letters to and
   from its leader Alfred Milner were culled, removed, burned or otherwise
   destroyed. [1] In 2013 we closely examined many of Milner’s remaining
   papers which are held in the Bodleian Library, Oxford. They bear
   witness to the zeal with which much evidence of wrongdoing has been
   obliterated. Secret dispatches that we know from other sources that he
   sent, have disappeared. Incriminating letters penned by King Edward VII
   – a leading player in the secret cabal before his death in 1910 – were
   subject to an order that they must be destroyed immediately on his
   death. Admiral Jacky Fisher a Royal favourite, noted in his Memories
   that he had been advised by Lord Knollys, the king’s private secretary,
   to burn all letters sent to him by the king. Fisher consequently burned
   much of his royal correspondence but couldn’t bear to part with it all.
   [2] Lord Nathaniel Rothschild likewise ordered that his papers and
   correspondence be burned posthumously lest his political influence and
   connections became known. As his official biographer commented, one can
   but ‘wonder how much of the Rothschilds political role remains
   irrevocably hidden from posterity’. [3]

   In Britain crucial primary documents about the lies and deceit
   surrounding the First World War through diaries, memoirs and important
   letters were censored and altered, evidence sifted, removed, burned,
   carefully ‘selected’ and falsified. Bad as that may be, it is of
   relatively minor importance compared to the outrageous theft of crucial
   papers from across Europe. In the immediate post-war years, hundreds of
   thousands of important documents pertaining to the origins of the First
   World War were taken from their countries of origin to the west coast
   of America and concealed in locked vaults at Stanford University. The
   documents, which would doubtless have exposed the men really
   responsible for the war and their transgressions, had to be removed to
   a secure location and hidden from prying eyes. It was the greatest
   heist of history that the world has ever known.

   Herbert Hoover

   Herbert Clark Hoover, a corrupt and bullying ‘mining engineer’
   reinvented as a munificent humanitarian and international relief
   organiser, was the Secret Elite agent charged with the mammoth job of
   stealing the European documents. In modern day parlance had it all been
   recorded on computer, he was the one who pressed the delete button. He
   had earlier been tasked with ensuring that Germany had sufficient
   supplies of food, without which the war would have been over by 1915.
   Far from just being the man who saved the Belgian people from
   starvation during the war, his so-called ‘Belgian Relief’ agency also
   fed the German army in order to prolong the conflict and maximise
   profit for the banking and armaments manufacturing elites on both sides
   of the Atlantic. [4] Hoover’s American-based organisation raised
   millions of dollars through loans and public donation, shipped vast
   quantities of food and necessities to war-torn Europe and made obscene
   profits for his backers, yet no documentary evidence of this enormous
   enterprise could be found at the end of the war. It had disappeared.
   All of it. Impossible, surely?

   The theft of Europe’s historical documents was dressed in a cloak of
   respectability and represented as a philanthropic act of preservation.
   These documents, it was claimed, would be properly archived for the use
   of future historians. The official line was that if not removed from
   government agencies in France, Russia, Germany and elsewhere, the
   papers detailing the extent of Hoover’s work would ‘easily deteriorate
   and disappear’. [5] It was no chance decision that only documents
   relating to the war’s origins and ‘Belgian relief’ were taken. No
   official British, French or American government approval was sought or
   given. Indeed, like the thief in the night, stealth was the rule of
   thumb. On the basis that it was kept ‘entirely confidential’, Ephraim
   Adams, professor of history at Stanford University and a close friend
   of Hoover’s from their student days, was called to Paris to coordinate
   the great heist and give it academic credence.

   In 1919, Hoover recruited a management team of ‘young scholars’ from
   the American army and secured their release from military service. They
   were primarily interested in material relating to the war’s true
   origins and the sham Commission for Relief of Belgium. Other documents
   concerning the conduct of the war itself were ignored. His team used
   letters of introduction and logistical support to collect import /
   export bills, sales and distribution records, insurance documents and
   local customs permits amongst a plethora of incriminating evidence.

   He established a network of representatives throughout Europe and
   persuaded General John Pershing to release fifteen history professors
   and students serving in various ranks of the American Expeditionary
   Force in Europe. [6] He sent them, in uniform, to the countries his
   agency was feeding. With food in one hand and reassurance in the other,
   they visited nations on the brink of starvation and faced little
   resistance in their quest. They made the right local contacts,
   ‘snooped’ around for archives and found so many that Hoover ‘was soon
   shipping them back to the US as ballast in the empty food boats’. [7]
   Hoover recruited an additional 1,000 agents whose first haul amounted
   to 375,000 volumes of the ‘Secret War Documents’ from European
   governments. [8] It has not been possible for us to discover who
   actually funded this gargantuan, massively expensive venture.

   The removal and disposal of incriminatory British and French material
   posed little or no problem and with the Bolsheviks in control, access
   to Russian documents from the Czarist regime proved straightforward.
   They undoubtedly contained hugely damaging information on how the
   assassination of Franz Ferdinand in Sarajevo on 28 June 1914 had been
   orchestrated through Petrograd, and how Russia’s general mobilisation
   on Germany’s eastern border had been the real reason for the war
   starting. It might appear strange that the Bolsheviks cooperated so
   willingly by allowing Hoover’s agents to remove twenty-five carloads of
   material from Petrograd. [9] However, when one realises that the
   international bankers in the secret society had financed and
   facilitated Lenin and Trotsky’s return to Russia, and the Bolshevik
   Revolution itself, it becomes clear. [10] The Americans could have what
   they wanted. This surprising event was reported in the New York Times
   which claimed that Hoover’s team bought the documents from a
   ‘doorkeeper’ for $200 cash. [11] And some people think that fake news
   is a twenty-first century concept.

   Removal of documents from Germany presented few problems. Fifteen
   carloads of material were taken, including ‘the complete secret minutes
   of the German Supreme War Council’ – a ‘gift’ from Friedrich Ebert,
   first president of the post-war German Republic. Hoover explained this
   away with the comment that Ebert was ‘a radical with no interest in the
   work of his predecessors’. [12]

   German President, Friedrich Erbert

   But the starving man will exchange even his birthright for food.
   Hoover’s men also acquired 6,000 volumes of German court documents
   covering the complete official proceedings of the Kaiser’s pre-war
   activities and his wartime conduct of the German empire. [13] If
   Germany had been guilty of planning and starting the war – as decreed
   by Court Historians ever since – these documents would have proved it.
   Strange that none have ever been released. Had there been incriminating
   documents, it is certain that copies would have been sent out
   immediately to every press and news agency throughout the world proving
   Germany was to blame. The removal and concealment of the German
   archives by the Secret Elite was crucial because they would have proved
   the opposite: Germany had not started the war.

   By 1926, the ‘Hoover War Library’ at Stanford University was so packed
   with archived material that it was legitimately described as the
   world’s largest collection of First World War documentation. [14] In
   reality, this was no library. While the documents were physically
   housed within Stanford, the collection was kept separate and only
   individuals with the highest authority had keys to the padlocked gates.
   It was the Fort Knox of historical evidence, a closely guarded
   establishment for items too sensitive to share. In 1941 carefully
   selected archives were made available to genuine researchers. Over the
   previous two decades the unaccountable ruling cabal – the very men
   responsible for WW1 – had unfettered control over them.

   What they withheld from view, shredded, or put in the Stanford furnace
   will never be known. Suffice to say that no First World War historian
   has ever reproduced or quoted any controversial material housed in what
   is now known as the Hoover Institution on War, Revolution and Peace.
   Indeed, it is a startling fact that no war historian has ever written
   about this utterly astonishing theft of the European war documents and
   their shipment to America.

   ‘To the victor go the spoils and history is part of that booty’, but it
   is our history. We should be demanding to know what is hidden from us.
   The First World War was the seminal event of the twentieth century, and
   all that followed, including WW2, came as a direct consequence. The
   people of Britain and Germany, indeed the world, have a right to know
   the full extent of what has been secretly retained, hidden, or posted
   ‘missing’ regarding responsibility for that war.

   1. A.M. Gollin, Proconsul in Politics, p. 551, footnote.
   2. Lord Fisher, Memories and Records, vol. 1, p. 21.
   3. Niall Ferguson, House of Rothschild, vol. II, p. 319.
   4. Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty, Prolonging the Agony, p. 201 et
   seq.
   5. Cissie Dore Hill, Collecting the Twentieth Century, p. 1
   http://www.hoover.org/publications/hoover-digest/article/8041
   6. Charles G. Palm and Dale Reed, Guide to the Hoover Institution
   Archives, p. 5.
   7. Whittaker Chambers, Hoover Library
   http://whittakerchambers.org/articles/time-a/hoover-library/
   8. New York Times, 5 February 1921.
   9. Whittaker Chambers, Hoover Library at
   http://whittakerchambers.org/articles/time-a/hoover-library/
   10. Macgregor and Docherty, Prolonging the Agony, p 453 et seq.
   11. New York Times, 5 February 1921.
   12. Whittaker Chambers, Hoover Library at
   http://whittakerchambers.org/articles/time-a/hoover-library/
   13. New York Times, 5 February 1921.
   14. Hoover Institution, Stanford University at
   http://www.hoover.org/about/herbert-hoover
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 2 : The Rise Of The Money Power Control

   20 Tuesday Mar 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Uncategorized

   ≈ 3 Comments

   Carrol Quigley’s Tragedy and Hope revealed the ambitions of those whose
   wealth bought real power:

   …The powers of financial capitalism had a far-reaching plan, nothing
   less than to create a world system of financial control in private
   hands able to dominate the political system of each country and the
   economy of the world as a whole.’ [1]

   Free from any single political interference, this system was controlled
   in a feudalist fashion by the central banks of the world acting in
   concert, by secret agreements arrived at in private meetings and
   conferences. The apex of the system was to be the Bank for
   International Settlements in Basle, Switzerland, a private bank owned
   and controlled by the world’s central banks which were themselves
   private corporations. Quigley was adamant that ‘Each central bank …
   sought to dominate its government by its ability to control treasury
   loans, to manipulate foreign exchanges, to influence the level of
   economic activity in the country, and to influence cooperative
   politicians by subsequent economic rewards in the business world.’ The
   power of the central bank in each instance rested largely on its
   control of the credit and money supply. In the world as a whole the
   power of the central bankers rested very largely on their control of
   loans and of gold flows.

   Professor Quigley explained how, in 1924, Reginald McKenna, former
   British Chancellor of the Exchequer and at the time chairman of the
   board of the Midland Bank, told its stockholders: “I am afraid the
   ordinary citizen will not like to be told that the banks can, and do,
   create money … And they who control the credit of the nation direct the
   policy of Governments and hold in the hollow of their hands the destiny
   of the people.” [2]

   It was an extraordinarily frank statement from a man close to the inner
   circles of the British Establishment. The international bankers on Wall
   Street were intimately linked to the Rothschilds in London and Paris.
   They manipulated the political power of the state to create and corrupt
   the Federal Reserve System to gain a monopoly over the money issue
   through it.

   Professor Anthony Sutton

   Another important contributor to the unmasking of the money power,
   Professor Antony Sutton revealed that ‘The Federal Reserve has the
   power to create money. This money is fiction, created out of nothing …
   In brief, this private group of bankers has a money machine monopoly.
   This monopoly is uncontrolled by anyone and is guaranteed profit.’ [3]

   With a magic machine that created money from thin air, the
   international bankers were able to control not merely individual
   politicians, but entire governments. By comparison, controlling the
   writing and teaching of history was child’s play. Quigley deliberately
   revealed the names of the rich and powerful banks and bankers – the
   Gods of Money – who were intimately involved. They included N.M
   Rothschild, Barings, Hambros, Lazard Brothers and Morgan Grenfell in
   London. [4] On Wall Street were J.P. Morgan, Kuhn-Loeb & Co., J.D.
   Rockefeller and Brown Brothers and Harriman. [5] Members of these banks
   on both sides of the Atlantic ‘knew each other intimately.’ [6]

   Carroll Quigley had been invited by the secret society to study its
   membership, aims and objectives, and states he was helped in this by
   the British historian Alfred Zimmern who was himself a member of the
   secret cabal. It appears that Professor Quigley was actually chosen by
   the secret society to be its official historian. [7] He was one of the
   brightest stars in the galaxy of American academics. As a student at
   Harvard, Quigley had gained two top degrees and a Ph.D. He taught
   history at Princeton University and Harvard before moving to the School
   of Foreign Service at Georgetown as professor of history. He was a
   distinguished member of the American Association for the Advancement of
   Science, the American Anthropological Association and the American
   Economic Association for many years. He was also a consultant to the
   U.S. Department of Defence, the U.S. Navy and the Smithsonian
   Institution. He sat on the Congressional Select Committee which set up
   the National Space Agency. This is an outstanding professional record.
   Most men or women of ambition would have considered their careers to be
   crowned by any one of Quigley’s individual achievements. He had entry
   to the innermost workings of the powers which controlled the United
   States. It is vital that we appreciate that his voice comes form the
   inside looking out. He knew what was happening and how the system truly
   worked.

   Yet his personal position on these developments remains somewhat
   confused. Quigley stated that he admired the society and many of its
   members and its goals, but not its methods. [8] He believed they should
   abandon secrecy and make their aims and objectives clear to all. This
   may have been his downfall. To us it remains an enigma that Quigley
   said he admired these individuals and their globalist aims of a one
   world government controlled by bankers, yet on the very same page
   stated that their tendency to place power in and influence into hands
   chosen by friendship rather than merit, their oblivion to the
   consequences of their actions, their ignorance of the point of view of
   persons in other countries or of persons of other classes in their own
   country … have brought many of the things which they and I hold dear,
   close to disaster.’ [9]

   Alfred Zimmern

   Did Professor Quigley decide in the end, like his fellow historian
   Professor Alfred Zimmern, that the secret society posed such a menace
   to the world that he chose to expose it? We shall never know. Unable to
   ridicule Tragedy and Hope as ‘conspiracy theory’ because of his exalted
   academic position and status, those he named decided to bury the book.
   Immediately on its release, unknown persons removed it from bookstore
   shelves in America – ‘faster than exploding Easter bunnies’ as one wit
   put it. It was withdrawn from sale without any justification and its
   original plates were destroyed by Quigley’s publisher, the Macmillan
   Company. The publishing company was owned by the family of the Earl of
   Stockton, Harold McMillan, who was British Prime Minister 1957-1963 and
   at the heart of the British Establishment. Years later, when a rare
   surviving copy of Tragedy and Hope was found and an unknown publisher
   decided to pirate it, copies began to sell.

   Quigley was deeply offended by the suppression of a book which had
   taken him twenty years to write. In a 1974 radio broadcast he warned
   the interviewer, Rudy Maxa of the Washington Post: ‘You better be
   discreet. You have to protect my future, as well as your own.’ [10] He
   revealed in the interview that after the book was suppressed, for the
   next six years he repeatedly asked the publisher what was going on.
   They ‘lied, lied, lied’ to him and deliberately misled him into
   believing that it would be reprinted. Quigley stated that powerful
   people had suppressed his book because it exposed matters that they did
   not want known. Universities, academics and the mainstream media
   remained silent over his explosive revelations, the destruction of the
   book, and the disgraceful treatment of one of America’s top academics.

   The Anglo-American Establishment by Carroll Quigley

   Unbeknown to them, Quigley had written an earlier history (in 1949) of
   the all-powerful secret society titled The Anglo-American
   Establishment. Though some of the facts came to him from sources which
   he was not permitted to name, he presented only those where he was
   ‘able to produce documentary evidence available to everyone’. [11] The
   book carried far greater detail of the secret society than Tragedy and
   Hope, especially on the English side of the Atlantic. It exposed
   exactly who its members were and their intricate family, banking and
   business inter-connections. It revealed how they controlled politics,
   the major newspapers, and the writing and teaching of history through
   Oxford University. It was clearly such an explosive expose of the
   ruling cabal, and placed him in such potential danger, that he would
   not allow it to be published in his lifetime. The book was only
   released in 1981, four years after his death. We consider The
   Anglo-American Establishment to be the most important work of modern
   history written in the twentieth century.

   The relevance of Quigley’s work in the context of fake history derives
   from the fact that he revealed exactly how the secret society
   controlled its writing and teaching through a ‘triple-front penetration
   in politics, education, and journalism.’ [12] They did so through their
   domination of Oxford University, and Balliol College and All Souls
   College in particular. They recruited men of ability, chiefly from All
   Souls and controlled them through the granting of titles and positions
   of power. They were thus able to influence public policy and education
   by placing these individuals at the apex of public institutions such as
   universities, shielding them as much as possible from public attention
   criticism. [13] Viscount (Lord) Alfred Milner was the leading player in
   the society’s growth and development from the late 1890s until his
   death in 1925. He gathered around him a brood of talented Oxford men,
   utterly loyal to the primacy of the British Empire in pursuit of a new
   world order. Quigley wrote that no country that values its safety
   should allow what the Milner group accomplished; ‘that is, that a small
   number of men would be able to wield such power in administration and
   politics, should be given almost complete control over the publication
   of documents relating to their actions, should be able to exercise such
   influence over the avenues of information that create public opinion,
   and should be able to monopolise so completely the writing and the
   teaching of the history of their own period. [14]

   All Souls College, Oxford

   ‘Almost complete control over the publication of documents relating to
   their actions’ is, in a nut-shell, how they control history, turn
   history from enlightenment to deception. The Secret Elite dictated the
   writing of history from the ivory towers of academia at Oxford, and
   what was taught thereafter in universities, colleges and schools across
   the land. To this day, researchers are denied access to documents
   because the Secret Elite has much to fear from the truth. They ensure
   that we learn only those ‘facts’ that support their version of history.
   They are determined to wipe out all traces that lead back to them, and
   take every possible step to ensure that it remains exceedingly
   difficult to unmask their crimes.

   They carefully controlled the publication of official government
   papers, the selection of documents for inclusion in the official
   version of the history of the First World War and all that followed.
   Incriminating documents were burned, removed from official records,
   shredded, falsified or deliberately rewritten, so that what remained
   for genuine researchers and historians was carefully selected material.
   The professors of history who wrote the false history of the First
   World War had been carefully selected in the pre-war years by the
   ruling elite and placed in chairs of modern history and the history of
   war at Oxford. These chairs had been set up and fully funded by members
   of the secret society whose outrageous wealth was based on their gold
   and diamond investments in South Africa. Few, if any, historians
   elsewhere dared question these “eminent” men at the “world’s leading
   university.” This fake history has been ingrained in the minds of
   generations of British schoolchildren over the past century. Any
   alternative view is heresy.

   Unable to ridicule the Anglo-American Establishment as conspiracy
   theory due to the late Professor Quigley’s high status, and clearly
   concerned that any publicity would simply draw attention to it, the
   ruling elite decided to bury it. Anyone ignorant of how tightly
   controlled the mainstream media is might expect quality newspapers to
   headline this explosive work and praise Quigley as a hero for exposing
   the destruction of the democratic process. He had uncovered and
   revealed a deep and very dangerous corruption which posed a grave
   threat to our way of life. What happened? Nothing. No newspaper or
   television station reviewed or commented on his incendiary book. None.
   It was blanked by ‘official’ history. To our knowledge and to their
   shame, no mainstream academic historian has ever written a review of
   this stunning work. What we must ask is; was anyone permitted to offer
   such a critique?

   1. Carroll Quigley, Tragedy and Hope, A History of the World in Our
   Time, p. 324.
   2. Ibid., p. 325.
   3. Antony C. Sutton, The Federal Reserve Conspiracy, p. 2.
   4. Quigley, Tragedy and Hope, p. 500.
   5. Ibid., pp. 529-531.
   6. Quigley, Anglo-American Establishment, p. ix.
   7. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ynVqPnMQ2sI
   8. Quigley, Anglo-American Establishment, p. xi.
   9. Ibid.
   10. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JeuF8rYgJPk
   11. Quigley, Anglo-American Establishment, p. x.
   12. Ibid., p.15.
   13. Ibid.
   14. Ibid., p.197.
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Fake History 1: Controlling Our Future By Controlling Our Past

   13 Tuesday Mar 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Carroll Quigley, Oxford University,
   Propaganda, Secret Elite

   ≈ 5 Comments

   George Orwell, press photograph. The term ‘Fake News’ has only recently
   entered common parlance, but it has a long history. Lies masquerading
   as news are as old as news itself, with royalty, governments, public
   figures and the mainstream media purveying it to manipulate public
   opinion. In an Orwellian twist those very same groups now employ it as
   a pejorative term against the alternative media and truth writers and
   bloggers as way of dismissing inconvenient truths and crushing dissent.
   We should all be aware of the state as keeper of the ‘the truth’. “Fake
   History” is another powerful weapon that has long been used by those in
   authority to retain that power by keeping the masses in the dark. As
   the late George Orwell wrote:

   ‘Who controls the past controls the future. Who controls the present
   controls the past’.

   It is the unelected, unaccountable individuals who control central
   banking, governments and the mainstream media, who control the writing
   and teaching of the fake history that enables them to enslave us. After
   almost seventy years Orwell’s observation may appear somewhat clichéd,
   but it is now more relevant than ever. The highly perceptive author
   added: ‘The most effective way to destroy people is to deny and
   obliterate their own understanding of their history.’

   If we were able to grasp the truth of our past, could we begin to
   determine our own future? In the first instance the lies and mythology
   need to be challenged by honest history, hard but necessary truths and
   historical revision. ‘Revisionism’, according to Joseph Stromberg in an
   article he wrote about Professor Harry Elmer Barnes, ‘refers to any
   efforts to revise a faulty exiting historical record or
   interpretation.’ [1] Professor Barnes, himself one of the greatest
   revisionists of the 20th century, wrote that revisionism has been most
   frequently and effectively applied to correcting the historical record
   relative to wars because ‘truth is always the first war casualty.’ [2]
   Hold that important statement close. The emotional abuses and
   distortions in historical writing are greatest in wartime.
   Consequently, both the need and the material for correcting historical
   myths are most evident and profuse in connection with wars.

   Hidden History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry
   Docherty and Jim Macgregor Prolonging The Agony by Jim Macgregor and
   Gerry Docherty

   The present authors’ long years of research into the origins and
   conduct of the First World War of 1914-18 (though it continued until
   the signing of peace in 1919) demonstrates just how accurate Professor
   Barnes understanding was. Mainstream historians tell us that Germany
   was guilty of starting WW1 and committing the most barbarous crimes
   throughout. Proud, virtuous Britain, on the other hand, was forced to
   go to war against this German evil to fight ‘for freedom, civilisation
   and the integrity of small helpless nations.’ It is all a deliberately
   concocted lie. Patriotic myths and the victors’ wartime lies and
   propaganda had been scripted into Britain’s “Official History.” In
   truth, Britain – or to be more precise, immensely rich and powerful men
   in Britain – were directly responsible for the war that killed over 20
   million people. Kaiser Wilhelm II and Germany did not start the war,
   did not want war and did what they could to avoid it.

   But it is not just First World War history that is involved in the
   grand deception. Our contention that virtually the entire received
   history of the twentieth century has been faked, and requires urgent
   and complete revision, will raise no eyebrows in enlightened circles.
   It will most definitely elicit howls of derision and cries of
   “impossible” and “conspiracy theory” from the vast majority. Self
   interest or cognitive dissonance?

   These blogs cannot cover the many thousands of examples of historical
   falsehoods or omissions we found in our historical research – our books
   do that – but it explains how the men behind the curtain actually
   created fake history. Their multifaceted approach ranges from the
   straightforward destruction or concealment of documents and books, to
   the more subtle methods of employing Court Historians and the ‘peer
   review’ system.

   Who is responsible for fake history?

   Before we examine how history is faked we need to understand who fakes
   it and why. In this regard, the most important influences on our work
   were books by Professor Carroll Quigley, Tragedy and Hope, A History of
   The World In Our Time and The Anglo-American Establishment.

   The astonishing 1,300 page tome Tragedy and Hope, published in 1966,
   revealed the existence of secret society initially created by Cecil
   Rhodes in London in 1891. Its aim was to expand the British Empire to
   all habitable parts of the world. The enlarged empire would be run by
   wealthy upper class elites and based on English ruling class values.
   These people felt obliged to rule the entire world because they
   considered the vast majority of the human race was too ignorant to do
   so themselves. In the decades following Rhodes death in 1902, the
   secret society evolved. It became transnational as the singularly
   British elite merged with the American money-power; Quigley’s
   Anglo-American Establishment.

   This would aim to become a world government. The geographical axis
   moved from London to New York. Later the U.N. was created as one of its
   instruments towards one world government. Members of the secret society
   controlled the United States, the White House, the Federal Reserve
   System and Wall Street. They likewise controlled Britain, Downing
   Street, the Bank of England and the City, the financial district of
   London. They ruled from behind the scenes and were not necessarily the
   major political players known to everyone. They selected major
   political figures and funded and controlled them. They would not be the
   great teachers or historians, but they decided who would be elevated to
   the great chairs of learning. They funded historians who wrote the fake
   histories. This secret group has been the world’s major historical
   force since before World War 1 and, according to Professor Quigley,
   every major event in history since then has been dominated by them. [3]

   Professor Carroll Quigley
   The secret society was…one of the most important historical facts of
   the twentieth century. Indeed, the Group is of such significance that
   evidence of its existence is not hard to find, if one knows where to
   look. [4]

   We looked, followed the clues, trails and names presented by Professor
   Quigley and were utterly astonished to find that a secret cabal
   actually existed, with unfettered powers in Britain and the United
   States. Quigley called them the ‘Group’; we have termed them the Secret
   Elite, but they are also variably known as the Money Power, the Deep
   State, the Men behind the Curtain and so forth. The shocking evidence
   went much deeper than that exposed by Quigley, and proved to us beyond
   all doubt that the individuals involved in the cabal – in both London
   and New York – were responsible for starting, and unnecessarily
   prolonging, the First World War. Through enormous wealth, power and
   control of Oxford University, they were able to cover their tracks and
   fabricate a history which blamed Kaiser Wilhelm II and Germany. A
   century later, that fake history is still presented as truth by
   ‘eminent’ mainstream historians with links to Oxford.

   1. Quote from Jeff Riggenbach, Why American History is Not What They
   Say: An Introduction to Revisionism, p. 72.
   2. Ibid., p. 73.
   3. For an excellent summary of the role of the secret society see G.
   Edward Griffin’s talk. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ynVqPnMQ2sI
   4. Carroll Quigley, The Anglo-American Establishment, pp. ix-x.
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Prolonging the Agony 2: The Full Hidden History Exposed

   06 Tuesday Mar 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Belgian Relief, Carroll Quigley, Gallipoli,
   Georges Clemenceau, Herbert Hoover, Kaiser Wilhelm II, President
   Woodrow Wilson, Secret Elite, Wall Street, Zionism, Zionism

   ≈ 3 Comments

   This is the second blog about the recently published Prolonging The
   Agony.

   In a single volume, the real History of how the First World War was
   deliberately prolonged to the benefit of the charlatans, profiteers,
   and the Secret Elite can be fully understood.

   It is impossible to pick any single scandal above the others, but one
   which has been studiously ignored by the history boys is the Herbert
   Hoover and the Commission for Relief in Belgium. This one time American
   mining engineer and future President of the United States, previously
   criticised for rampant dishonesty by the courts in London, was chosen
   by the Secret Elite to head an international fraud which was paid for
   by the Allies and underwritten by the U.S.government. It claimed to
   provide food for the exclusive use of the population of Belgium and
   Northern France which were occupied by the German army.

   What we have uncovered is an enormous double-deal whereby not only did
   food go to Belgium, food that was often sold for profit, but supplies
   also went to Germany directly down the River Rhine. We know that Edith
   Cavell saw what was happening. As an avid letter writer whose letters
   were printed in the Times, she threatened to expose the scandal. This
   is a story of money, bankers and producers colluding to reap millions
   from the desperation of a hungry Europe, and in so doing prolonged the
   bloody war.

   Yet another scandal was the complete farce of the Gallipoli campaign.
   Because the Russians had suffered such vast losses on the Eastern
   Front, the Czar demanded evidence that war was worthwhile. The promise
   of Constantinople was the prize which animated him most, and the
   Gallipoli campaign was concocted by the Secret Elite to make it appear
   that a serious effort was underway to attack Turkey and win
   Constantinople for Russia. It was set up to fail. You may think this
   impossible, but Prolonging the Agony provides detailed evidence that
   the campaign was an orchestrated farce from start to finish. But it
   convinced the Russians and kept them in the war. The Secret Elite had
   no intention of ever giving the strategically vital port of
   Constantinople to Russia. Ever. The story and the needless sacrifice is
   a disgrace. Indeed Gallipoli was an outrageous and deliberate failure,
   but it prolonged the war, as was required. Your reaction to this
   statement may well be……it can’t be true. Please read the chapters on
   this crucial event. They will make you uncomfortable.

   And there could have been peace, several times over. But peace was not
   on the Secret Elite agenda. When, by 1916, the military failures were
   so costly and embarrassing some key players in the British government
   were willing to talk about peace and discuss what that might mean. This
   could not be tolerated. The potential peacemakers had to be ditched.
   Lloyd George was promoted to prime minister in Britain and Georges
   Clemenceau made prime minister in France. The unelected European
   leaders had one common bond. They would fight Germany until she was
   crushed. Prolonging the Agony details how the secret cabal organised
   the change of government without a single vote being cast. A new
   government, an inner-elite war cabinet thrust the Secret Elite leader,
   Alfred Milner into power at the very inner-core of the decision-makers
   in British politics. Democracy? They had no truck with democracy. The
   voting public had no say. The men entrusted with the task would keep
   going till the end and their place-men were backed by the media and the
   money-power, in Britain, France and America. The only end they had in
   mind was Germany destroyed.

   The entry of America into the war changed everything. The money men
   were covered by the Federal Reserve System. They could print dollars
   and finance their war in safety. Loans were guaranteed by governments.
   The American economy was literally underpinned by the war spending, and
   all on the back of the ordinary citizens and taxpayers. Millionaires
   blossomed. Poverty for the many grew. Even the election of Woodrow
   Wilson in 1916 was tainted by doubt. The manner of his re-election is
   ignored in mainstream accounts. It all hinged on California and the
   recount was itself tainted with corruption.

   We examine the emergence of Zionism as a factor in the political world.
   From the first years of the twentieth century we have unmasked the
   close relationship between Zionism and the British and French
   Rothschilds. The background to the Balfour Declaration shows how far
   the British cabinet was willing to support the Zionist ambitions for
   Palestine. This was NOT, as it is portrayed, a simple message from the
   British Foreign Secretary to the head of the Rothschild family in
   Britain. It was the product of years of scheming and political pressure
   that eventually won there backing of the Secret Elite. And prolonging
   the war here was also important. Before the Zionist claim over
   Palestine could have any pertinence, they had to buy time to establish
   institutions and boost investment. The immense duplicity the British
   government and the connivance of the American administration is
   explained in full. And it raised serious questions about loyalties.

   While the Russian Revolution might appear to have little to do with
   prolonging the war, it did. Did you know that the last foreign
   politician to meet the Car before he abdicated was Secret Elite leader
   Alfred Milner? Co-incidence? What transpired between the two? Milner’s
   behaviour and report when he returned to London was so strange that one
   has to conclude that he had much to hide.What promises were whispered
   to Czar Nicolas before he abdicated? Worse was to follow. The raping of
   Russia by the money-men who financed the Bolsheviks, links Wall Street
   to the Kremlin… and of course, since Russia had decided to end the war
   with Germany, the promise of Constantinople was revoked. For ever. How
   convenient.

   When Germany surprisingly sought an Armistice to find grounds for Peace
   in 1918, it was on the basis of President Woodrow Wilson’s Fourteen
   Points. The myth history here is deplorable. Historians and journalist
   continue to this day to claim that the First World War ended on 11
   November, 1918. It did not. Germany was undefeated on the field of
   battle. Beaten but not crushed. In a move which has been airbrushed
   from official history, the Allies, mainly Britain, continued to apply a
   full and complete blockade of Germany so that for the next eight months
   hundreds of thousands, if not millions, of their women and children
   were starved to death. The rise of Bolshevism in Germany became so
   dangerous that even war hawks like Lloyd George realised that Germany
   had to be allowed to survive in a much reduced state. Finally the terms
   of the Treaty of Versailles, never ratified by the American Congress,
   were so damaging that the causes of the Second World War were literally
   sewn into the fabric.

   Prolonging the Agony is unique. It details the lies and malpractice
   through which an evil war was prolonged. The old order in Europe was
   swept aside and it shows how the new order emerged from a joint
   Anglo-American Establishment. It merged the Secret Elite in Britain
   with the Morgan-Wall street powers through joint policy making by a
   self-appointed group of ‘right-thinking’ men. We name them. We also
   acknowledge the impressive work of Professor Carroll Quigley in
   initially exposing the machinations of the evil men who aimed to take
   over the new world order.

   And then they stole our history. Literally. All of the evidence of the
   gross malpractice, the profiteering, the lies and the propaganda about
   the cause of the war and about the running of the war was swept up and
   taken away from its European roots. All of the pre-war papers and
   documents which would have shown how far the Kaiser went to try to
   avoid war, disappeared. The vast quantity of international permits and
   papers about the running of the American Relief in Belgium,
   high-jacked. The key Russian diplomatic  evidence sold for a pittance
   was removed to America. Taken under instruction by the organisation set
   up by Herbert Hoover, it was removed to Stanford University and there
   what remains of the evidence lies under lock and key. Our history. Our
   truth. To be fair, our governments also burned, redacted, removed,
   shredded and otherwise abused the historical fact by destroying
   evidence of their malpractice and lies. Prolonging the Agony details as
   much of this destruction of history as we currently know. Breve and
   persistent journalists continue to push for sight of all documents.
   Historians do not.

   You have to give time to this frank exposure. You will have questions
   to ask. You will be angered at the waste of life and the selfishness of
   the rich and the powerful dynasties. You will want to ask again and
   again how they managed to sweep such a litany of wrong-doing under the
   proverbial carpet. You will be alarmed at the manner in which we have
   been lied to; at the stolen history; at the way in which you have been
   misled. After ten years of constant research and inquiry, we still are.

   Prolonging the Agony puts into your hands the awful truth behind a war
   which could have been brought to a reasonable conclusion in 1915. The
   cost in human terms of all that transpired from 1915-1919 is so
   horrendous, that it has been studiously kept from us. Even 100 years
   later, the lies persist. Read this book. There is much more to it than
   has been outlined here. Consider the implications. Be angry.

   Now available from Trineday Publications in the USA and though Amazon
   across the world. We are delighted to announce that our German
   publishers, Kopp Verlag will undertake a translation in German, and our
   French publishers, Editions Nouvelle Terre, are currently considering a
   similar decision.
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Prolonging The Agony 1

   27 Tuesday Feb 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Blockade, J.P. Morgan jnr., Lusitania,
   Oxford University, Secret Elite

   ≈ 2 Comments

   We are lied to. We know that more than ever today, but the lies and
   misrepresentations about the first World War have been accepted as
   truth. Arm yourself with the awful facts.

   Part Two in the Hidden History series by Gerry Docherty and Jim
   Macgregor.

   At last, having spent ten years working together on the origins and
   management of the First World War, our second book, Prolonging the
   Agony, How the Anglo-American Establishment Deliberately Extended WW1
   by Three-and-a Half Years, has been published, and is available to our
   readers from TrineDay in the U.S. and Amazon and other book sellers
   across the world.

   It had never been our intention to divide the history into two parts,
   but our original publisher, Mainstream of Edinburgh, convinced us that
   it was the best way forward. Mainstream was sold to Random House
   shortly after Hidden History, The Secret Origins of the First World War
   was published, and this proved problematic for us. Random House
   declined to either promote the book or take up the option for our
   second book. However sales remained strong and Hidden History was
   translated and published in both German and French. A Swedish edition
   is also currently being considered. To our delight TrineDay in Oregon
   offered to publish Prolonging the Agony and we are indebted to Kris
   Milligan and his team for encouraging and supporting us. It is
   heartening that within weeks of the book’s release, both the German and
   French publishers have indicated that they will also be publishing it.

   So what is it about?

   Prolonging the Agony lays before the reader a vast amount of evidence
   which reveals how enormously rich and powerful men in Britain and the
   U.S. deliberately prolonged WW1 while reaping even greater fortunes
   from it. It retraces the major lies and malevolent propaganda generated
   in Britain and America to justify war against Germany, and the reason
   it was prolonged beyond the spring of 1915 in order to crush her. The
   Secret Elite, the cabal which worked endlessly to bring war to Europe
   with a view to creating a new world order, was responsible. To cover
   their tracks, the elites and their agents ensured that a false history
   was created to justify all that happened. Prolonging the Agony
   deconstructs that false history page by page.

   The range and membership of the Secret Elite in the run up to the First
   World War.

   It examines in detail how the British government borrowed on an
   unprecedented scale from Wall Street bankers to fund the munitions of
   death. The links between leading players – such as the Rothschild
   banking family and their JP Morgan banking associates on Wall Street –
   were formalised to a point where the British economy was literally
   handed to this money-power cabal. We demonstrate the extent of the
   anti-German lies and propaganda emanating from Oxford University, the
   academic home of the Secret Elite in Britain, and how it lead to
   millions of young British men enlisting to fight under totally false
   pretences . Winning the hearts and minds of the American public, so
   that they aligned with the financiers, proved a more difficult task,
   but the fact that the United States would enter the war was guaranteed
   from the outset by their place-man in the White House, President
   Woodrow Wilson and his minder, Edward Mandel House.

   Lies concocted in 1914 to blacken Germany in every way are still
   circulated today as fact. This False History lives on through the
   British Court Historians who repeat the nonsense. We prove absolutely
   that while Nurse Edith Cavell – the great British heroine of the war
   who was executed by a German firing squad in Belgium in 1915 – was
   indeed a brave patriot, she was secretly and intimately associated with
   a Belgian spy ring linked to the British Secret Service. Edith Cavell
   and her Belgian associates helped repatriate hundreds of British and
   French soldiers who were stranded behind enemy lines in the first
   months of the war. They also passed vital information about German
   deployment to the  War Office in London. But Edith threatened to
   endanger the secret agreements about food supply by revealing the
   scandal through he connections with the Times. For generations that
   fact was buried so that her execution would look like an act of
   brutality by the German commanders against an innocent, humanitarian
   nurse. The truth is otherwise.

   In a similar vein, lies and propaganda were circulated about the
   sinking in 1915 of the ocean liner Lusitania by a German U-boat.
   Received history turned this act into German malevolence in order to
   cause outrage in America and swing public opinion there towards the
   Allies. 1,195 lives were lost including 140 Americans. Only now, after
   sustained detective work by Mitch Peeke and his Liverpool team in
   tracking down the cargo manifest of the Lusitania, are the authorities
   in both Britain and the U.S. obliged to admit their complicity in
   creating and maintaining false accounts of the sinking. The recently
   uncovered manifest proves that the ‘passenger liner’ was secretly
   carrying many thousands of rounds of ammunition and tons of U.S.
   explosives to Britain. It also proves that the German authorities were
   right. Britain and America were flouting the clear-cut regulations
   about neutrality. Their well-publicised advice to passengers to avoid
   the Lusitania was both justified and ignored. Shockingly, elements
   within the British Admiralty knew full well that the German U-boat was
   waiting in the exact path of the Lusitania as she passed the southern
   coast of Ireland, yet withdrew her naval escorts and failed to warn her
   captain. Why? We believe they were complicit in the sinking for their
   own purposes.

   In our opinion the best researched account of the sinking of the
   Lusitania.

   Bad as this was, our sustained research through documents, records, and
   published books and texts which were dismissed in the post-war years,
   turned our dismay to utter disgust. Again and again we found secret
   agreements, understandings, practices and deliberate actions taken in
   order to prolong the war and prolong the agony. And it is this fact,
   which was repeatedly stated from many quarters during the conflict,
   which hit us hardest.

   We have amassed proof of the unprecedented scale on which the war was
   unnecessarily prolonged. It could have been drawn to a conclusion by
   December 1915 and millions of victims would have been spared the misery
   of mutilation or horrendous death. But the war was prolonged
   mercilessly so that profits would surpass the dreams of Midas and
   Germany crushed as a rival.

   Amongst many disturbing examples, Prolonging the Agony examines the
   scandal of the French Briey Basin iron and steel mines and forges which
   the French army could either have occupied on the first day of the war
   or destroyed, in order to stop them falling into German hands. Despite
   repeated calls for the French army to destroy the forges, the French
   authorities would not allow it. An expedition to bomb the forges was
   slapped down by the French High Command. Who gave the orders? Who made
   the profits? To whose instructions was the French government
   answerable? It was a scandal which has been swept under the carpet to
   avoid accountability. Had Briey been destroyed, Germany would not have
   had the raw materials and munitions to fight beyond 1915.

   What is the truth of the so-called blockade of the North Sea passages
   which allegedly starved Germany of its resources? A truly brave and
   remarkable small fleet comprising very old vessels, none of which was
   built for the high seas task, sat out in the unforgiving Atlantic and
   North Sea to stop all contraband getting into Germany from August 1914
   onwards. What happened? Virtually every ship they brought into port
   under escort was allowed to continue its journey by order of the
   Admiralty in London. Yet the public and parliament believed that
   Germany was being starved of its war necessities. They believed the lie
   because Winston Churchill said a full blockade was in place and that
   Germany would surrender in nine months.

   Typical Atlantic swell against which the brave Blockade Force tried to
   protect Britain.

   The inner-elite of the British cabinet had no intention of ending the
   war until Germany was crushed … not just beaten. The facts presented
   are drawn from archived evidence and Admiralty papers. Our thesis
   endorses and builds on the outrage expressed by the Admiralty’s
   representative in Scandinavia during WW1, Naval Attaché Rear-Admiral
   Consett. He detailed how  the Allies were secretly supplying Germany
   through Scandinavian ports and prolonging the conflict. Had a blockade
   been properly undertaken the war would have ended by 1915. What was a
   going on? Prolonging the Agony explains precisely that.

   We also raise the issue which is omitted from mainstream analysis:
   where was Germany procuring her vital oil supplies? She had no natural
   reserves herself, and her access to oil could easily have been stopped.
   Our book investigates the multiple abuses in oil provision and traces
   the ownership of these oil fields. The compliance of the owners and
   shareholders, British and American, demonstrated the importance of war
   profits at any cost.

   To hell with your countrymen who had to be sacrificed.

   In our next blog we will outline the impact of other major influences
   and agencies who had a vested interest in Prolonging the Agony
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   ← Older posts

   CAPTION: October 2019

   M  T  W  T  F  S  S
   « Aug
      1  2  3  4  5  6
   7  8  9  10 11 12 13
   14 15 16 17 18 19 20
   21 22 23 24 25 26 27
   28 29 30 31

Recent Posts

     * Questioning History. Would you like to take part?
     * The Only Way Is Onwards
     * Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence
     * Fake History 5: The Peer Review Process
     * Fake History 4: Concealment Of British War-time Documents
     * Fake History 3: From Burning Correspondence To Permanently Removing
       The Evidence
     * Fake History 2 : The Rise Of The Money Power Control
     * Fake History 1: Controlling Our Future By Controlling Our Past
     * Prolonging the Agony 2: The Full Hidden History Exposed
     * Prolonging The Agony 1

Archived Posts

   Archived Posts [Select Month__]

Categories

   Categories[Select Category____________]

PROLONGING THE AGONY

   Prolonging The Agony: How international bankers and their political
   partners deliberately extended WW1 by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty

SIE WOLTEN DEN KRIEG

   Sie wollten den Krieg edited by Wolfgang Effenberger and Jim Macgregor

HIDDEN HISTORY

   Hidden History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry
   Docherty and Jim Macgregor

FRENCH EDITION

   L’Histoire occultée by Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor

GERMAN EDITION

   Verborgene Geschichte geheime Menschheit Weltkrieg by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Follow First World War Hidden History on WordPress.com

Follow Blog via Email

   Enter your email address to follow this blog and receive notifications
   of new posts by email.

   Join 328 other followers

   ____________________

   (BUTTON) Follow via Email

RSS feed reader required

   RSS Feed

   Blog at WordPress.com.
   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________
   loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   Post to
   Cancel Reblog Post

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
   This is an OpenID server

   #First World War Hidden History » Feed First World War Hidden History »
   Comments Feed First World War Hidden History » Questioning History.
   Would you like to take part? Comments Feed The Only Way Is Onwards
   alternate alternate First World War Hidden History WordPress.com

     * Unmasking The Myths And Lies
     * How And Why It All Began
     * About The Authors
          + Gerry Docherty
          + Jim Macgregor
     * Publications Available
          + Prolonging The Agony
          + Sie wollten den Krieg
          + Hidden History
          + L’Histoire occultée
          + Verborgene Geschichte

First World War Hidden History

   Search: Search…_____________ Go
   First World War Hidden History

Questioning History. Would you like to take part?

   23 Friday Aug 2019

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Uncategorized

   ≈ Leave a comment

   Although we have stopped our World War 1 blogs for the time- being, Jim
   and I frequently liaise with other researchers, to which end Jim will
   be visiting Canada shortly. I have been giving a number of talks since
   these blogs began, having been invited to speak at the Edinburgh
   International Book Festival, at conferences in Brussels and Dublin, for
   several groups in London and on a World War 1 battlefields trip through
   France and Belgium.

   I have been invited to speak at an exciting conference in December,
   details of which can be found below. The conference is entitled
   Questioning History and I have been asked to talk on two subjects,
   namely The Coup of 1916 ( which bears remarkable similarities to what
   is happening to us today ) and The True history of a great British
   Patriot, Edith Cavell.

   The whole project which is led by Professor Gloria Moss from the
   University of Hertford looks really varied and interesting.
   She has produced a short promotional video for the weekend of 14/15
   December – see https://youtu.be/HR7FGLcybU8.  It would be great to see
   and meet others who share our interest in why history is regularly
   hidden. The event comprises:
   –  Pre-Christmas weekend on  ‘Questioning History’
   – date of 14-15 December
   – 30/40 mins from London
   –  Early Bird tickets throughout August and first two weeks of
   September
   –  Website https://awakeandawareholid.wixsite.com/website
   – Email: all inquiries to awakeandawareholidays@gmail.com
   – Books and videos by speakers available for sale (and signed making
   excellent gifts)
   Thanks again for all of your support over the years,
   Gerry Docherty
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Related

Post navigation

   ← Previous post

   Comments are closed.

   CAPTION: August 2019

   M  T  W  T  F  S  S
   « Apr
            1  2  3  4
   5  6  7  8  9  10 11
   12 13 14 15 16 17 18
   19 20 21 22 23 24 25
   26 27 28 29 30 31

Recent Posts

     * Questioning History. Would you like to take part?
     * The Only Way Is Onwards
     * Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence
     * Fake History 5: The Peer Review Process
     * Fake History 4: Concealment Of British War-time Documents
     * Fake History 3: From Burning Correspondence To Permanently Removing
       The Evidence
     * Fake History 2 : The Rise Of The Money Power Control
     * Fake History 1: Controlling Our Future By Controlling Our Past
     * Prolonging the Agony 2: The Full Hidden History Exposed
     * Prolonging The Agony 1

Archived Posts

   Archived Posts [Select Month__]

Categories

   Categories[Select Category____________]

PROLONGING THE AGONY

   Prolonging The Agony: How international bankers and their political
   partners deliberately extended WW1 by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty

SIE WOLTEN DEN KRIEG

   Sie wollten den Krieg edited by Wolfgang Effenberger and Jim Macgregor

HIDDEN HISTORY

   Hidden History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry
   Docherty and Jim Macgregor

FRENCH EDITION

   L’Histoire occultée by Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor

GERMAN EDITION

   Verborgene Geschichte geheime Menschheit Weltkrieg by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Follow First World War Hidden History on WordPress.com

Follow Blog via Email

   Enter your email address to follow this blog and receive notifications
   of new posts by email.

   Join 328 other followers

   ____________________

   (BUTTON) Follow via Email

RSS feed reader required

   RSS Feed

   Blog at WordPress.com.
   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________
   loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
   #First World War Hidden History » Feed First World War Hidden History »
   Comments Feed First World War Hidden History » The Only Way Is Onwards
   Comments Feed Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence
   Questioning History. Would you like to take part? alternate alternate
   First World War Hidden History WordPress.com

     * Unmasking The Myths And Lies
     * How And Why It All Began
     * About The Authors
          + Gerry Docherty
          + Jim Macgregor
     * Publications Available
          + Prolonging The Agony
          + Sie wollten den Krieg
          + Hidden History
          + L’Histoire occultée
          + Verborgene Geschichte

First World War Hidden History

   Search: Search…_____________ Go
   First World War Hidden History

The Only Way Is Onwards

   24 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Secret Elite, Wall Street

   ≈ 1 Comment

   We have come to the end of our blogs covering the running of the First
   World War by the Secret Elites in London and then, as the money-power
   flexed its muscle, America. The whole expose is recorded in Prolonging
   the Agony, which is now available through Amazon and can be ordered by
   quality bookshops.

   Prolonging The Agony by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty Hidden
   History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Though this is by no means the end of the line, we will take a break
   from the weekly blogs but hope to release occasional pieces as evidence
   is slowly unmasked across the world.

   Thanks to everyone who contributed in any way, to our regular readers
   whose encouragement and contributions we greatly appreciated. You guys
   care was we do. Where circumstances allow point doubters to our blogs
   or either of the major works, Hidden History, The Secret Origins of the
   First World War and, just released, Prolonging the Agony, How the
   Anglo-American Establishment Deliberately Extended WW1 by
   Three-and-a-Half Years.

   Take care in a world where we are still lied to by governments, as was
   the case one hundred years ago.

   Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Related

Post navigation

   ← Previous post Next post →

1 thought on “The Only Way Is Onwards”

    1. Herb Weber said:
       24 April, 2018 at 12:21 pm
       Thank you for what you’ve done so far and for keeping it up. I have
       had my suspiciions about the First World War since I did a paper on
       its causes in second year history in 1961. (The prof didn’t like it
       because I questioned established history.) My studies and reading
       since then have forced me to the conclusion that no war has ever
       lived up to its propaganda billing, and that the First and Second
       World Wars actually should be called the British Wars because
       Britain pulled the strings and hid it all with propagandsa. And as
       you well know, the process of staging wars for purpose continues
       with a vengeance.

Leave a reply Cancel reply

   Enter your comment here...

   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________

   Please log in using one of these methods to post your comment:
     *
     *

       IFRAME: googleplus-sign-in

     *
     *

   Gravatar
   Email (required) (Address never made public)
   ____________________
   Name (required)
   ____________________
   Website
   ____________________
   WordPress.com Logo

   You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out /
   Change )
   Google photo

   You are commenting using your Google account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Twitter picture

   You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Facebook photo

   You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Cancel

   Connecting to %s

   [ ] Notify me of new posts via email.

   Post Comment

   CAPTION: April 2018

   M  T  W  T  F  S  S
   « Mar       Aug »
                     1
   2  3  4  5  6  7  8
   9  10 11 12 13 14 15
   16 17 18 19 20 21 22
   23 24 25 26 27 28 29
   30

Recent Posts

     * Questioning History. Would you like to take part?
     * The Only Way Is Onwards
     * Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence
     * Fake History 5: The Peer Review Process
     * Fake History 4: Concealment Of British War-time Documents
     * Fake History 3: From Burning Correspondence To Permanently Removing
       The Evidence
     * Fake History 2 : The Rise Of The Money Power Control
     * Fake History 1: Controlling Our Future By Controlling Our Past
     * Prolonging the Agony 2: The Full Hidden History Exposed
     * Prolonging The Agony 1

Archived Posts

   Archived Posts [Select Month__]

Categories

   Categories[Select Category____________]

PROLONGING THE AGONY

   Prolonging The Agony: How international bankers and their political
   partners deliberately extended WW1 by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty

SIE WOLTEN DEN KRIEG

   Sie wollten den Krieg edited by Wolfgang Effenberger and Jim Macgregor

HIDDEN HISTORY

   Hidden History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry
   Docherty and Jim Macgregor

FRENCH EDITION

   L’Histoire occultée by Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor

GERMAN EDITION

   Verborgene Geschichte geheime Menschheit Weltkrieg by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Follow First World War Hidden History on WordPress.com

Follow Blog via Email

   Enter your email address to follow this blog and receive notifications
   of new posts by email.

   Join 328 other followers

   ____________________

   (BUTTON) Follow via Email

RSS feed reader required

   RSS Feed

   Blog at WordPress.com.

   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   Post to
   Cancel Reblog Post
   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________
   loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
   #First World War Hidden History » Feed First World War Hidden History »
   Comments Feed First World War Hidden History » Fake History 6 : The
   Failure Of Primary Source Evidence Comments Feed Fake History 5: The
   Peer Review Process The Only Way Is Onwards alternate alternate First
   World War Hidden History WordPress.com

     * Unmasking The Myths And Lies
     * How And Why It All Began
     * About The Authors
          + Gerry Docherty
          + Jim Macgregor
     * Publications Available
          + Prolonging The Agony
          + Sie wollten den Krieg
          + Hidden History
          + L’Histoire occultée
          + Verborgene Geschichte

First World War Hidden History

   Search: Search…_____________ Go
   First World War Hidden History

Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence

   17 Tuesday Apr 2018

   Posted by Jim_and_Gerry in Fake History, Gallipoli, Hiding Sources,
   Propaganda, Secret Elite

   ≈ Leave a comment

   Establishment historians place great value on the use of primary source
   evidence. This is described as ‘Narrative Fixation’ by the heterodox
   economist Edward Fullbrook [1] who cites Einstein’s famous aphorism:
   ‘Whether you can observe a thing or not depends on the theory which you
   use: It is the theory which decides what can be observed.’

   Professor Fullbrook stated that in his academic field, by adopting a
   single point of view and refusing to admit alternative insights,
   economists deprive themselves of the means of a fuller understanding of
   the matters they seek to explain. But it is not just in economics that
   such limitations become apparent. The narrative fixation on the
   dialectical side of scientific development has had, and continues to
   have, a deleterious consequence in the human sciences. This involves
   all of the Humanities and Social Sciences including, as we see here,
   History. In any attempt to understand a complex truth, what is required
   is a multiplicity of points of view – a width of methodologies and
   epistemologies – a ‘Narrative Pluralism’ – but academic historians have
   a narrative fixation: No documents; no narrative. [2] In an article,
   The Frailty of Historical Truth: Learning Why Historians Inevitably
   Fail, published by the American Historical Association, Professor David
   Lowenthal stated, ‘Secondary sources are ipso facto unreliable.’ [3]

   The fundamental problem in war history, as we and other revisionists
   have clearly demonstrated, lies in the fact that it is underpinned by
   primary sources which are unreliable – not least because so many have
   been systematically destroyed, falsified, altered, misrepresented,
   hidden or ‘lost’. In the absence of reliable primary source evidence,
   it is entirely legitimate – indeed it is mandatory on the part of
   truth-seekers – to look to other means of establishing what has
   occurred, what continues to happen and why. Secondary
   sources/circumstantial evidence are a taboo in historical research, yet
   they play such an important role in the criminal law courts and can
   literally mean a matter of life or death? In homicide cases or other
   serious felonies, police detectives act much like historians in
   searching the past for evidence. If it is considered that sufficient
   evidence has been uncovered, the accused is sent for trial before a
   jury of his peers.

   The gold standard in law courts is direct evidence, but in the majority
   of cases there is none and only indirect circumstantial evidence is
   available. By way of example, direct evidence is presented if a witness
   states that she saw the defendant pull out a gun and actually shoot the
   victim. On the other hand, if she did not witness the shooting but saw
   the defendant enter a house with a gun, heard a gunshot and screaming
   and thereafter saw the defendant leave carrying the gun, it is
   circumstantial evidence. If two or more independent witnesses testify
   to this, it is very powerful circumstantial evidence.

   Circumstantial evidence – and that includes fingerprints and forensic
   evidence presented by expert witnesses – allows for more than one
   explanation. When different strands of such evidence are drawn together
   and each corroborates the conclusions drawn from the others, we have
   every reason to the serious notice. For hundreds of years attorneys
   have talked about the ‘cable’ of circumstantial evidence. A cable is
   made up of many strands which individually are not particularly strong,
   but the more strands which are applied to the cable the stronger it
   becomes. In many, if not indeed the majority of legal cases, it is this
   cable of circumstantial evidence which solidly links an accused to the
   crime. Juries in the United States and elsewhere are entitled to reach
   a verdict on such evidence, and Judges are able to condemn an
   individual to death on the strength of that verdict. The U.S. Supreme
   Court has stated that ‘circumstantial evidence is intrinsically no
   different from testimonial [direct] evidence,’ [4] yet academic war
   historians deride its use.

   Straightforward lies, concealment of important evidence, a peer review
   system that encourages only accounts sympathetic to the Establishment,
   and insistence on using only primary source documents (which in reality
   are generally the remnants which have survived the Establishment’s
   cull) are all important elements in the production of fake history.

   In the early 1970s, Canadian war historian Nicholas D’Ombrain began
   researching British War Office records. He noted: ‘The Registry Files
   were in a deplorable condition, having suffered the periodic ravages of
   the policy of “weeding”. One such clearance was in progress during my
   foray into these files, and I found that my material was being
   systematically reduced by as much as five-sixths.’ [5] Astonishingly, a
   large amount of ‘sensitive’ material was actually removed as the
   researcher went about his business. Where did it go? He accused the
   establishment of systematic withdrawal of evidence. Who authorised its
   removal? In addition, D’Ombrain noted that minutes of the Committee of
   Imperial Defence and ‘circulation and invitation lists’ together with
   much ‘routine’ correspondence had been destroyed. [6] That D’Ombrain
   found five-sixths of the total files melting away in front of him
   demonstrated clearly that unnamed others still retained a vested
   interest in keeping hidden, genuine evidence of historical record.

   On conducting our own research we noted that the official notice in the
   Public Record Office List of Cabinet Papers warns, ‘the papers listed …
   are certainly not the whole of those collectively considered by Cabinet
   Ministers.’ The gap, however, is breath-taking. No effort is made to
   explain why crucial records are missing or what happened to them.
   Nothing is included from 14 July until 20 August, 1914. Nothing. This
   period covered the crucial two week ‘July Crisis’ in the run up to the
   First World War, the British declaration of war on Germany on 4 August,
   and the files remain empty until almost three weeks into the war
   itself. [7] It beggars belief that such crucial Cabinet papers relating
   to one of the most significant events in British history have
   disappeared.

   While official Cabinet papers for the time frame do not exist –
   presumably destroyed (the files at the National Archives at Kew in
   London were completely empty) we know what was going on in some detail
   because Prime Minister Asquith (aka ‘Squiffy’ because it was alleged
   that he drank a bottle of cleared each evening) was writing letters to
   his paramour, Venetia Stanley, and sharing secret Cabinet details with
   her. Had Asquith not communicated privately and very indiscreetly to
   his young paramour, much of what was discussed at those crucial
   meetings would be lost to history. His letters of August 2, 3, 4, 5, 6,
   8, 9, 10, 11, 12, contain the inner secrets of what was said by whom in
   those crucial Cabinet meetings whose minutes were presumably destroyed.
   The Letters to Venetia Stanley, essentially Asquith’s love letters [8]
   was collated in 1982 and therefore not subject to the post-war censor.
   This unquestionably saved the information from being redacted or
   burned.

   When researching later Cabinet Memoranda housed in the National
   Archives, [9] pages were found to be missing. Page 685, which was in a
   series which included crucial confidential documents about Herbert
   Hoover’s Belgian Relief, has been torn out. Despite this, we had more
   than sufficient evidence to prove that Britain and America were
   secretly provisioning Germany through Hoover’s organisation in order to
   prolong the war. Countless documents are missing, but in fairness to
   the librarians and custodians of the Public Record Office, they could
   only catalogue what was passed to them from the Cabinet Office, the
   Foreign Office, the War Office and the Colonial Office. It is not the
   fault of librarians.

   An Australian expert on Gallipoli, Harvey Broadbent, had a similar
   experience when researching the archives: ‘… Difficulties lie in the
   fact that not all Gallipoli documents seem to be present in the
   National Archives. There are gaps in document collections of certain
   events and at crucial times of the campaign.’ [10] Broadbent, though
   reluctant to say so in public, harbours suspicions that the 1915
   Gallipoli campaign (where over a quarter of a million allied soldiers
   and sailors, including many from Australia and New Zealand, were killed
   or badly wounded) was deliberately set up to fail by the British and
   French governments. We gathered many individual strands of
   circumstantial evidence on this, wound them in to a very strong rope,
   and have absolutely no doubts whatsoever that it was indeed
   deliberately set up to fail.

   The doomed project went ahead to enable greater geo-political
   strategies which would benefit the Secret Elite, including post-war
   control of oil in the Middle East and control of Palestine. Gallipoli
   was a disaster for the allies in 1915 and the truth had to be concealed
   at all costs from the peoples of colonial Australia and New Zealand or
   they would have reacted severely against both the ‘Mother country’ and
   the war. Yet the lies persist, and the Anzacs continue to cerebrate a
   disaster dressed as a glorious sacrifice; an honour to Australian and
   New Zealand youth. Lies, lies, lies.

   It is evident that falsification of the history of the twentieth
   century has involved a wide range of nefarious subterfuge. Today, the
   accepted mainstream version continues to be taken as the source for new
   books and documentaries in film and television. The ideal of
   objectivity was abandoned long ago. Highly biased and selective choices
   were made from the infinite number of true facts. Some were given a
   central place, others marginalised. Facts were selected to align with
   the narrative which the oligarchs demanded. Many inaccurate, muddled or
   tainted primary sources were chosen to mislead. A range of documents
   might be brought into the public domain with one crucial piece of the
   jigsaw removed. This skewed the picture, deliberately. And there were
   lies, outrageous lies, levied against anyone who stood as a potential
   barrier to elite rule and one world government by exposing the truth.
   Yet all of that is merely the tip of the rotten iceberg and represents
   what we can actually recognise when we scrutinise the given record.
   Below the surface lie vast quantities of documents removed from public
   scrutiny and hidden away in places such as Stanford and Hanslope. It
   seems possible, if not indeed likely, that other as yet unknown
   depositories exist. It is impossible to say how many records remain
   concealed to this day, or have already found their way into furnaces in
   a factual holocaust. As an iceberg in warmer water gradually melts and
   recedes from the bottom up, so the records decrease in volume, unseen,
   unknown and unreported as more and more are selected for destruction.
   In the age of mass communication we have less access to the truth about
   history than the generations before us. This is no mistake.

   As in so many other areas, when researching history a good opening
   question is: Cui bono? Who benefits from this systematically destroyed,
   falsified, altered, hidden or ‘lost’ evidence? The Elites, past and
   present? The court historians whose success is predicated upon
   conformity?

   In the words of Professor Hillel Ticktin, academic economics, is
   ‘useless – utterly useless’. So too in any objective sense is academic
   history. Its value resides only in supporting the present-day elites
   who pay the piper and own the pipes.

   If Orwell’s aphorism holds true it is imperative that we revise the
   entire historical record of the twentieth century. It may already be
   too late, but we have to dispel pessimism to stand any chance of taking
   control of our own future. Much has already been done by revisionists
   such as Harry Elmer Barnes, Antony Sutton and Guido Preparata, and not
   least by Carroll Quigley who provided the signposts we need on this
   complex journey. But the ruling elite today are more adept at burying
   the truth than ever – as witnessed by the vast percentage of the
   ‘educated’ peoples of the world who remain totally unaware of their
   existence, or the fact that democracy is a sham. Modern history in its
   entirety requires grassroots revision.

   There is too another concern. The selection of approved versions of
   history dictates what is taught in our universities and schools.
   Scottish schoolchildren are taught certain aspects of the First World
   War but all contentious issues are absent from the syllabus. Attending
   a conference in Brussels several years ago we learned that Belgian
   schoolchildren are taught absolutely nothing about the ‘Committee for
   the Relief of Belgium’ which was directly at the centre and the most
   significant institution in the country’s First World War history.
   Internationally, university professors and departmental heads determine
   the body of knowledge from which degrees are judged. Armed with their
   prized degrees, those who progress to a career in history are obliged
   to teach from the same sacred scripture in schools, colleges or
   universities. No one questions this. No one dares. School and college
   students are then examined on their historical learning and
   understanding from texts blessed with institutional approval. Thus,
   generation after generation, we witness the perpetuation and
   consolidation of fake history.

   It would be ludicrous to suggest that all modern historians or war
   historians are intentionally producing fake history, but they raise no
   dissenting voice against those who do. The distressing reality is that
   brave revisionist historians are a very rare breed indeed. Academic
   historians of all colours need to muster their courage to speak truth
   to power and stop toeing the Establishment line. The fact that it is
   not historians but ordinary men and women who are at the vanguard of
   the historical truth movement today brings shame to their profession.
   The verdict of history itself will surely judge them harshly.

   1. E. Fullbrook, Narrative Fixation in Economics, World Economics
   Association, London, 2016.
   2. Dr. John O’Dowd, personal communication.
   3. David Lowenthal, The Frailty of Historical Truth: Learning Why
   Historians Inevitably Fail, American Historical Association.
   https://www.historians.org/publications-and-directories/perspectives-on
   -history/march-2013/the-frailty-of-historical-truth
   4. Holland v. United States, 348 U.S. 121, 75 S. Ct.127, 99 OL. Ed.150
   [1954]
   5. Nicholas D’Ombrain, War Machinery and High Policy, preface, p.xiii.
   6. Ibid.
   7. List of Cabinet Papers, 1880–1914. PRO booklet.
   8. Michael Brock, H.H.Asquith letters to Venetia Stanley.
   9. Cabinet Papers, 1905-1918 Volume IV ref: FO 899/4.
   10. Harvey Broadbent, Gallipoli: One Great Deception?
   http://www.abc.net.au/news/2009-04-24/30630
     * Twitter
     * Facebook
     * More
     *

     * Print
     * Email
     *
     * Reddit
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

Related

Post navigation

   ← Previous post Next post →

Leave a reply Cancel reply

   Enter your comment here...

   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________

   Please log in using one of these methods to post your comment:
     *
     *

       IFRAME: googleplus-sign-in

     *
     *

   Gravatar
   Email (required) (Address never made public)
   ____________________
   Name (required)
   ____________________
   Website
   ____________________
   WordPress.com Logo

   You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out /
   Change )
   Google photo

   You are commenting using your Google account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Twitter picture

   You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Facebook photo

   You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out /  Change )
   Cancel

   Connecting to %s

   [ ] Notify me of new posts via email.

   Post Comment

   CAPTION: April 2018

   M  T  W  T  F  S  S
   « Mar       Aug »
                     1
   2  3  4  5  6  7  8
   9  10 11 12 13 14 15
   16 17 18 19 20 21 22
   23 24 25 26 27 28 29
   30

Recent Posts

     * Questioning History. Would you like to take part?
     * The Only Way Is Onwards
     * Fake History 6 : The Failure Of Primary Source Evidence
     * Fake History 5: The Peer Review Process
     * Fake History 4: Concealment Of British War-time Documents
     * Fake History 3: From Burning Correspondence To Permanently Removing
       The Evidence
     * Fake History 2 : The Rise Of The Money Power Control
     * Fake History 1: Controlling Our Future By Controlling Our Past
     * Prolonging the Agony 2: The Full Hidden History Exposed
     * Prolonging The Agony 1

Archived Posts

   Archived Posts [Select Month__]

Categories

   Categories[Select Category____________]

PROLONGING THE AGONY

   Prolonging The Agony: How international bankers and their political
   partners deliberately extended WW1 by Jim Macgregor and Gerry Docherty

SIE WOLTEN DEN KRIEG

   Sie wollten den Krieg edited by Wolfgang Effenberger and Jim Macgregor

HIDDEN HISTORY

   Hidden History: The secret origins of the First World War by Gerry
   Docherty and Jim Macgregor

FRENCH EDITION

   L’Histoire occultée by Gerry Docherty and Jim Macgregor

GERMAN EDITION

   Verborgene Geschichte geheime Menschheit Weltkrieg by Gerry Docherty
   and Jim Macgregor

   Follow First World War Hidden History on WordPress.com

Follow Blog via Email

   Enter your email address to follow this blog and receive notifications
   of new posts by email.

   Join 328 other followers

   ____________________

   (BUTTON) Follow via Email

RSS feed reader required

   RSS Feed

   Blog at WordPress.com.

   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   Post to
   Cancel Reblog Post
   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________
   loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
